<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891103-0042 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.11-03-89.f2.A1041</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 212 / Friday, November 3, 1989/ Proposed Rules <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of the Secretary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">24 CFR Parts 200, 215, 221, 236, 247, 290, 760, 813, 880, 881, 882,883, 884, 885, 886, 887, 900, 904, 905, 913, and 960 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. R-89-1445; FR-2588-P-01] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN No. 2501-AA80 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Income Verification Procedures for Applicants and Participants inHUD Programs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Office of the Secretary, HUD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Proposed rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> This rule would govern the collection and use of wageand claim information and the collection of employee income informationabout applicants and participants in HUD's assisted housing programs. Thisrule would require these applicants and participants to sign and submitconsent forms when they apply for participation in a program subject tothis rule, or when their continuing eligibility to participate in a programis determined. These consent forms would permit (1) HUD, the Public HousingAgency (PHA), or the owner responsible for determining eligibility foror level of benefits to verify employee income information with previousor current employers, and (2) HUD or the PHA to request wage and claiminformation from the State agency responsible for the administration ofthe State unemployment law (State Wage Information Collection Agency [SWICA]).Failure of any applicant or participant to sign the required consent formwould constitute grounds for denying eligibility, or continuing eligibility,under the program involved. The rule would help decrease the incidenceof fraud, waste, and abuse in these programs. Covered programs would includehousing assistance programs under 24 CFR chapter II, Subchapter B; andthe section 8 and Public and Indian Housing programs under 24 CFR chaptersVIII and IX. This rule would provide protections for applicants and participants inHUD programs from improper use of wage and claim information obtained froma SWICA by HUD or a PHA by restricting the use of the information to officialpurposes. This rule would also prohibit termination, denial, suspension,or reduction of benefits unless the information is independently verifiedand the applicant or participant has an opportunity to contest adversefindings. This rule would also provide criminal and civil penalties in certain circumstances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES:</T2> Comments must be received by January 2, 1990.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES:</T2> Comments on the rule: Interested persons are invitedto submit comments regarding this rule to the Rules Docket Clerk, Officeof the General Counsel, room 10276, Department of Housing and Urban Development,451 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20410-0500. Communications shouldrefer to the above docket number and title. A copy of each communicationsubmitted will be available for public inspection by interested personsduring regular business hours (7:30 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. weekdays) in theOffice of the Rules Docket Clerk at the address listed above.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> For the Section 8 programs administeredby the Assistant Secretary for Housing: James Tahash, Director of Planningand Procedures, Office of Multifamily Housing Management, room 6182, 4517th St., SW., Washington, DC 20410, telephone number (202) 426-3944 (TDDnumber (202) 755-0455). For the 202 Elderly and Handicapped program administeredby the Assistant Secretary for Housing: Robert Wilden, Director, AssistedElderly and Handicapped Division, room 6116, 451 7th St., SW., Washington,DC 20410, telephone number (202) 426-8730. For the Public Housing programadministered by the Assistant Secretary for Public and Indian Housing:Edward C. Whipple, Chief, Occupancy Branch, Office of Public Housing, room4206, 451 7th St., SW., Washington, DC 20410, telephone number (202) 426-0744(TTD number (202) 245-0850). For the Indian Housing program administeredby the Assistant Secretary for Public and Indian Housing: Dom Nessi, Director,Office of Indian Housing, room 4232, 451 7th St., SW., Washington, DC 20410,telephone number (202) 755-1015 (TDD number (202) 426-0744). For questionsconcerning the submission and use of consent forms: Dennis Raschka, Director,Fraud Control Division, Office of Inspector General, room 8254, 451 7thSt., SW., Washington, DC 20410, telephone (202) 426-6493 (TDD number (202)426-0015). None of these telephone numbers are toll-free. As a convenience to commenters, the Rules Docket Clerk will accept briefpublic comments transmitted by facsimile (``FAX'') machine. The telephonenumber of the FAX receiver is (202) 755-2575. (This is not a toll-freenumber.) Only public comments of six or fewer <T3>total </T3>pages will be accepted via FAX transmittal. This limitationis necessary in order to assure reasonable access to the equipment. Commentssent by FAX in excess of six pages will <T3>not </T3>be accepted. Receipt of FAX transmittals will not be acknowledged,except that the sender may request confirmation of receipt by calling theRules Docket Clerk at (202) 755-7084.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 </ITAG>The information collection requirements contained in this rule have beensubmitted to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) for review underthe Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980. Public reporting burden for the collectionof information requirements contained in this rule are estimated to includethe time for reviewing the instructions, searching existing data sources,gathering and maintaining the data needed, completing and reviewing thecollection of information, and filling out the consent forms. Informationon the estimated public reporting burden is provided later in this preambleunder the subheading, ``Findings and Certifications.'' Send comments regardingthis burden estimate or any other aspect of this collection of information,including suggestions for reducing this burden, to the Department of Housingand Urban Development, Rules Docket Clerk, 451 7th St., SW., room 10276,Washington, DC 20420; and to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs,Office of Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Statutory Basis </ITAG>This proposed rule would implement section 904 of the Stewart B. McKinneyHomeless Assistance Amendments Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-628, approved November7, 1988) (``McKinney Amendments'') for a number of HUD programs. Section 904(a), Definitions, requires HUD to define the terms ``applicant''and ``participant'' by regulation. It specifies, however, that the termsshall include members of an applicant's or participant's household, butnot include persons acting purely in their official capacity, such as Stateor local government officials or officers of lending institutions. Section 904(b), Applicant and Participant Consent, permits HUD to requireapplicants and participants (and members of their households) in any HUDprogram involving initial and periodic review of an applicant's or participant'sincome, to sign a consent form authorizing (1) HUD, the PHA, or the ownerto verify employee income information from current or previous employers;and (2) HUD or the PHA to request a SWICA to release wage and claim information.This subsection specifies that the consent may not be used to request taxpayerinformation protected by section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.Signing the consent form is made an explicit condition of initial or continuingeligibility for participation in the covered programs. This requirementis designed to ensure correct determinations of eligibility for and levelof benefits are made under these programs. Section 904(c)(1), Amendments to Social Security Act, adds a new section303(i) to the Social Security Act, which requires SWICAs to disclose wageand claim information to HUD and PHAs with respect to individuals who areapplying for or participating in any covered HUD assisted housing programand who have signed an appropriate consent form. Regulations prescribedby the Secretary of Labor will govern how often and in what form this informationmay be disclosed. The Department of Labor is required, after notice andhearing, to terminate further payments under the Social Security Act toa State where a SWICA has failed to substantially comply with a requestfor information. The new subsection 303(i) will expire on October 1, 1994,unless extended. Section 904(c)(2), Applicant and Participant Protections, protects applicantsand participants from the improper use by HUD or a PHA of information obtainedunder section 303(i) of the Social Security Act by restricting the useof the information to (1) verifying an applicant's or participant's eligibilityfor or level of benefits, or (2) informing the owner that the applicant'sor participant's eligibility is uncertain and needs to be verified. Thissection prohibits the termination, denial, suspension, or reduction ofbenefits without prior independent verification of the wage and claim information.The applicant or participant must also be notified of adverse findingsand be given an opportunity to contest them. Section 904(c)(3), Penalty, provides that any person who knowingly andwillfully requests or obtains under false pretenses any wage and claiminformation concerning an applicant or participant from a SWICA under thisauthority or who knowingly and willfully discloses any such informationin any manner to any individual not entitled under any law to receive it,shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not more than $5,000. This penaltyapplies to officers or employees of HUD, to officers or employees of PHAs,and to any owner (or employee of an owner) responsible for determiningeligibility for or level of benefits. This subsection also gives applicantsand participants a right of action for damages and other relief againstan officer or employee of any public housing agency or owner (or employeeof an owner) if the applicant or participant is affected by (1) a negligentor knowing disclosure of information referred to in section 904 of theMcKinney Amendents or section 303(i) of the Social Security Act about suchperson by the officer or employee of the PHA or the owner (or employeeof an owner) which is not authorized by section 904, section 303(i), orany implementing regulation or (2) any other negligent or knowing actionthat is inconsistent with section 904, section 303(i), or any implementingregulation. Section 904(d), Effective Date, provides for this section to take effectno earlier than September 30, 1989 with one exception. This exception givesa State or an agency of a State, with the approval of the Secretary ofLabor, the option of implementating the provisions governing the collectionof wage and claim information on any date which is after February 5, 1989(90 calendar days after November 7, 1988, the date of enactment of theMcKinney Amendments), but before September 30, 1989. In the case of anyState legislature which has not been in session for at least 30 calendardays (consecutive or not) between November 7, 1988 and September 30, 1989,the provisions governing the collection of wage and claim information shalltake effect 30 calendar days after the first day on which the legislatureis in session on or after September 30, 1989. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Structure of Rule </ITAG>This proposed rule would implement the requirements governing the collectionand use of wage and claim information obtained from a SWICA and of employeeincome information, including requirements pertaining to the signing andsubmission of consent forms, through two independent, but parallel, provisions.These are: 1. 24 CFR part 200, subpart V: This subpart would cover the Rent Supplementprogram; the section 221(d)(3) BMIR and 236 programs; and activity under24 CFR part 290, Management and Preservation of HUD Multifamily Projects.2. 24 CFR part 760: This part would cover the public housing and section8 housing assistance programs administered by HUD under 24 CFR chaptersVIII and IX. The remainder of the rule contains conforming changes that are designedto incorporate the proposed consent form requirements into the existingregulatory provisions to which the rule would apply. Readers should reviewthese changes carefully to determine matters such as the timing and contextof the required signing of consent forms and the effect upon eligibility,or continued eligibility, caused by a failure to meet the requirements.A. Programs Covered by the Rule The information collection requirements, including consent form requirements,contained in this proposed rule would apply to the following programs:1. 24 CFR part 200, subpart V, as follows:(a) Rent Supplement Payments under part 215. (b) Low Cost and Moderate Income Mortgage Insurance for Below Market InterestRate (BMIR) Mortgages under part 221. (c) Mortgage Insurance and Interest Reduction Payments for Rental Projectsunder part 236. (d) Management of HUD-Owned Multifamily Housing Projects under part 290.2. 24 CFR part 760. The Section 8 and Public and Indian Housing programs,as follows: (a) Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments for New Construction under part880. (b) Section 8 Housing Assistance Program for Substantial Rehabilitationunder part 881. (c) Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments for Housing Certificates andModerate Rehabilitation under part 882. (d) Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments, State Housing Agencies, underpart 883. (e) Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments, New Construction Set-Aside forsection 515 Rural Rental Housing Projects under part 884. (f) Loans for Housing for the Elderly or Handicapped under part 885. (g) Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments, Special Allocations under part886, subpart A (Loan Management) and subpart C (Property Disposition).(h) Section 8 Housing Vouchers under part 887. (i) Section 23 Housing Assistance Payments, New Construction and SubstantialRehabilitation, under part 900. (j) Low Rent Housing Homeownership Opportunities under part 904. (k) Indian Housing under part 905. (1) Admission to, and Occupancy of, Public Housing under part 960. B. ``Applicants'' Subject to the Rule The following is a complete list of ``applicants'' who would be coveredunder the rule: 1. 24 CFR part 200, subpart V: An individual or family that seeks assistanceunder part 215, 221 (BMIR), 236, or 290. 2. 24 CFR part 760. (a) An individual or family wishing to participate, or to receive assistance,as appropriate, under part 880, 881, 882, 883, 884, 885, 886, 887, and900. (b) A prospective homebuyer under part 904. (c) A prospective tenant or homebuyer under part 905. (d) A prospective tenant under part 960. C. ``Participants'' Subject to the Rule The following is a complete list of ``participants'' who would be coveredunder the rule: 1. 24 CFR part 200, subpart V: A tenant or qualified tenant under part215, 221 (BMIR), 236, or 290. 2. 24 CFR part 760. (a) A family receiving assistance under parts 880, 881, 882, 883, 884,885, 886, 887, and 900. (b) A homebuyer under part 904. (c) A homebuyer or tenant under part 905. (d) A tenant under part 960. D. Exclusion of Certain Individuals and Entities from the Rule's CoverageSection 904 of the McKinney Amendments excludes from its coverage thosepersons whose participation in a covered program is limited to their officialcapacity, such as State or local government officials or officials of lendinginstitutions. The Department believes that this provision is designed toexclude individuals whose sole function with respect to a transaction undera covered program is to <T3>facilitate </T3>the objective of the transaction. Thus, using the statutory examples, officials and employees of a StateHousing Finance Agency that is serving as contract administrator underthe Section 8 State Agency program (Part 883) would not have to sign consentforms for purposes of carrying out their responsibilities for the Agency.These statutory exclusions reflect the fact that the State or local agenciesand private owners, as well as their officials, do not <T3>participate </T3>in the program involved: their role is limited toaiding the successful completion of the transaction. Thus, these entitiesdo not have a sufficiently strong link to the transaction to justify executionof consent forms. The rule would also exclude from the consent requirements public housingagencies (PHAs) that participate in any covered program, irrespective ofwhether the PHA is acting as a facilitator (for example, as a section 8contract administrator), or as an actual participant (as where the PHAis a section 8 project owner or the owner or operator of public housing).The rule would also exclude from the consent requirements any ``entityapplicant'' (including its officers or employees) under the covered programs,such as any partnership, corporation, or any other association or entity,either non-profit or for profit, that seeks to participate as a privateowner in any of the programs contained in 24 CFR part 215, 221, 236, 880,881, 882, 883, 884, 885, 886, or 887. It would also exclude any individualwho seeks to participate as a private owner in any of the programs containedin 24 CFR part 221, 236, 880, 881, 883, 884, 886, or 887. However, anyemployee of one of the aforementioned entities who is an applicant foror participant in a covered program would still be subject to the consentform requirements. The exclusions cited above are based upon the discretion accorded the Departmentby section 904(a) of the McKinney Amendments to define the terms ``applicant''and ``participant.'' The Department does not believe the collection ofwage and claim information or employee income information from the officersand employees of these entities or from private owners will be sufficientlyuseful in combatting fraud, waste, and abuse to justify HUD requiring thesepersons to sign consent forms. E. Other Definitions 1. <T3>Claim information. </T3>``Claim information'' would be defined as informationregarding: (a) Whether an individual is receiving, has received or has applied forunemployment compensation; (b) The amount of compensation the individual is receiving or is entitledto receive; and(c) The period or periods when, or with respect to which, the individualactually received such compensation. This definition is consistent with the description of information, otherthan wage information, that HUD or a PHA is explicitly authorized to requestfrom a State agency under section 303(i) of the Social Security Act, asamended by section 904 of the McKinney Amendments. (See the definitionof ``wage information.'') Paragraph (c) of the definition is also properlyincluded as part of the definition since section 904(c)(1)(B) of the McKinneyAmendments prohibits the termination, denial, suspension, or reductionof benefits for applicants or participants, as applicable, based on wageand claim information without first independently verifying, among otherthings, information relating to the period or periods when or with respectto which, the applicant or participant actually received unemployment compensationbenefits. 2. <T3>Computer Matching. </T3>``Computer matching'' would be defined as theautomated comparison of data bases containing records about individuals.3. <T3>Computer Matching Agreement. </T3>``Computer matching agreement'' wouldbe defined as the agreement which describes the responsibilities and obligationsof the parties regarding a computer match. 4. <T3>Consent form. </T3>``Consent form'' would be defined as a consent formor forms approved by HUD to be signed by applicants and participants forthe purpose of obtaining employee income information from employers andwage and claim information from SWICAs. These consent forms may also beused to collect other information, including information which may be obtainedunder other laws, regulations, and handbooks. 5. <T3>Employee income information. </T3>``Employee income information'' wouldbe defined as all the information known to current or previous employerswhich HUD or the processing entity determines to be necessary for purposesof determining an applicant's or participant's eligibility for or levelof benefits in a covered program. 6. <T3>HUD. </T3>``HUD'' would be defined as the United States Departmentof Housing and Urban Development. 7. <T3>Owner. </T3>``Owner'' would be defined as the person or entity (oremployee of an owner) that leases an assisted dwelling unit to an eligiblefamily. 8. <T3>Public Housing Agency (PHA). </T3>``Public Housing Agency (PHA)'' wouldbe defined as any State, county, municipality, or other governmental entityor public body (or agency or instrumentality thereof) that is authorizedto engage in or assist in the development or operation of housing for lowerincome families under 24 CFR Chapters VIII or IX. The term includes Indianhousing authorities. 9. <T3>Processing entity. </T3>``Processing entity'' would be defined as theperson or entity that is responsible for making eligibility determinationsand any interim or regularly scheduled income reexaminations under anyof the covered programs. Examples of ``processing entity'' would includeprivate owners, PHA owners, or management agents under the Section 8 program;PHAs or Indian housing authorities (IHAs) that own and operate Public orIndian Housing projects; PHAs or IHAs that act as section 8 contract administratorsfor the Certificate, Moderate Rehabilitation, and Housing Voucher programsand owners of section 236, 221(d)(3) BMIR, or Rent Supplement projects.10. <T3>State Wage Information Collection Agency (SWICA) </T3>means the Stateagency receiving quarterly wage reports from employers in the State (whichmay be the agency administering the State's unemployment compensation program),or an alternative system which has been determined by the Secretary ofLabor, to be as effective and timely in providing employment related incomeand eligibility information. 11. <T3>Wage information. </T3>``Wage information'' would be defined as informationabout wages as defined in the State's unemployment compensation law andincludes the Social Security Number (or numbers, if more than one) andquarterly wages of an employee, and the name, address, State, and (whenknown) Federal employer identification number of an employer reportingwages under a State unemployment compensation law. This definition is adopted from the definition of ``wage information''used by the Department of Labor for purposes of the income and eligibilityverification system required under section 303(f) of the Social SecurityAct (see 20 CFR 603.2(b)). We have not included the part of that definitionwhich provides an alternative definition for ``wage information'' for Statesin which wages are not required to be reported under the unemployment compensationlaw. That part of the definition is not applicable to section 303(i)(1)(A)of the Social Security Act, which only requires disclosure of informationcontained in the records of SWICAs.F. Interaction with the Social Security Number Regulation This proposed rule would operate in conjunction with the final rule whichimplements section 165 of the Housing and Community Development Act of1987 (``1987 Act'') (54 FR 39680; September 27, 1989). Section 165 of the1987 Act authorizes HUD to require applicants and participants in certainHUD programs, including the ones covered by this rule, to disclose theirSocial Security Numbers (SSNs) or Employer Identification Numbers (EINs).SSNs obtained under that final rule would be used in computer matchingprograms to compare income information provided by the family with wageand claim information maintained by SWICAs, the disclosure of which wouldbe authorized by this proposed rule. HUD anticipates that computer matchingprograms will be the primary method by which HUD and PHAs obtain wage andclaim information from SWICAs, although requests relating to one or a fewfamilies may be possible depending on the matching agreements entered intobetween SWICAs and HUD or between SWICAs and individual PHAs. This proposedrule incorporates the changes made by the final SSN regulation. G. Information to be Covered by Consent Forms Section 760.3 and andSection; 200.1203 would specify that the informationcovered by consent forms signed by applicants and participants under thisrule would be (a) employee income information; and (b) wage and claim informationfrom a SWICA. The rule would explicitly prohibit the use of the consentforms for requesting taxpayer return information protected by section 6103of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. The consent forms could be designedto cover the collection of the information specified in item (a) or item(b) above, or both. Moreover, the consent forms could be used to collectother information which can be obtained under other laws, regulations,and handbooks. General authority to obtain information relating to eligibilityis provided in the program specific regulations for the assisted housingprograms contained in 24 CFR Chapter II, Subchapter B. More specific guidanceis provided through administrative instructions in program handbooks. Forthe section 8 and Public Housing programs, respectively, 24 CFR 813.109(b)and 24 CFR 913.109(b) authorizes, as a condition of eligibility or continuingeligibility, applicants and participants in the Section 8 and Public Housing(including Indian Housing) programs to sign consent forms authorizing anydepository or private source of income, or any Federal, State, or localagency, to furnish or release to the PHA or owner and to HUD such informationas the PHA, owner, or HUD determines to be necessary. Information is determinedto be necessary if it is to be used to determine or audit a family's eligibilityto receive housing assistance, to determine the Family's Adjusted Incomeor Tenant Rent, to verify related information, or to monitor compliancewith equal opportunity requirements. This regulation is in no way intended to interfere with HUD's current authorityto obtain information, including employee income information and wage andclaim information, necessary to determine an applicant's or participantseligibility for or level of benefits. Section 904, instead, provides explicitauthority to obtain wage and claim information in order to preempt certainState privacy acts which limit the ability of HUD and PHAs to collect wageand claim information from SWICAs. These State privacy acts interfere withHUD's ability to ensure that scarce Federal housing assistance is beingprovided in the correct amounts to the beneficiaries for which it is intended.Section 904 also explicitly authorizes the collection of employee incomeinformation so that wage and claim information can be independently verifiedbefore an applicant's or participant's benefits are terminated, denied,suspended, or reduced based on wage and claim information obtained froma SWICA. H. Consent by Applicants and Participants Applicants for and participants in the covered programs would have to signconsent forms and submit them to the processing entity. (See andSection;760.10 and andSection; 200.1210.) Applicants and participants would alsobe responsible for the signing and submission of consent forms by membersof their families. Members of the family under the age of 18 would notbe required to sign consent forms, unless that member is the family heador his or her spouse. The consent forms would permit (a) HUD, the PHA,or the owner to verify employee income information; and (b) HUD or thePHA to request a SWICA to release wage and claim information. All applicants,including members of their families, would have to sign the consent formsat the time when the eligibility of the applicant under any of the coveredprograms is being determined. Participants, including members of their families, who were not requiredto sign the consent forms as applicants (<T3>i.e.,</T3> those whose participation was initiated before the effectivedate of the rule) would have to sign the consent forms at the first regularlyscheduled income reexamination held after the effective date of the finalrule. Once a participant has signed and submitted a consent form as anapplicant or participant, that participant would still have to sign a subsequentconsent form at each regularly scheduled income reexamination to ensurethat all consents are timely dated to facilitate their use. Subsequent consent forms would also be required to be signed at the nextinterim or regularly scheduled income reexamination under the followingcircumstances: (1) Where there has been a change in the composition of the participant'sfamily, any new member of the family would have to sign and submit a consentform at the next interim or regularly scheduled income reexamination. (2) When a member of a family turns 18 years of age, that member wouldhave to sign and submit a consent form at the next interim or regularlyscheduled income reexamination. (3) Such other circumstances as HUD (and in the case of the Public Housingprogram, or the Section 8 Certificate, Housing Voucher, or Moderate Rehabilitationprogram, the PHA) may prescribe in administrative instructions. Examplesof these other circumstances might include situations where the consentform has been lost, the signature by the applicant or participant is illegible,or an employer requires a consent form with an original signature beforehe or she will disclose information. As noted above, members of a family under 18 years of age would not berequired to sign consent forms, unless that member of the family is thefamily head or his or her spouse. There is no reason for minors, who arenot family heads or spouses, to sign consent forms since their income isexcluded for purposes of calculating the annual income of a family underthe covered programs. HUD believes that the requirements relating to the signing of consent formsat interim income reexaminations and regularly scheduled income reexaminationsare not burdensome and reflect the Department's concern that signing ofconsent forms be required only where necessary to produce information helpfulto its efforts to mitigate abuse in HUD programs.The exact context for applicants and participants to sign the consent formswould be governed by the specific rules for the program involved. Readersshould review the proposed amendments to individual program regulationssubject to this rule for more information. As discussed in the next section, failure to sign consent forms constitutesgrounds for denying eligibility of an applicant, or for terminating assistanceor tenancy (or both) of a participant, under the covered program. I. Penalties for Failing To Sign Consent Forms This rule would permit HUD to require applicants and participants, as wellas members of their households, to sign consent forms as a condition ofeligibility, or continuing eligibility, for the covered programs. (SeeandSection; 200.1215 and andSection; 760.15). The Department believes thatfull implementation of the authority under section 904 for the coveredprograms is essential to achieve the legislative objective of controllingfraud, waste, and abuse in HUD programs. Each of the individuals requiredunder the rule to sign consent forms are receiving assistance from HUD,thereby justifying the Department's interest in ensuring that they areappropriate program beneficiaries or that they receive the proper levelof benefits. For applicants, the rule would provide that the failure to sign consentforms would be grounds for denying eligibility for the covered program.For participants, failure to sign consent forms would be grounds for terminationof assistance under the covered program and, if authorized under the program,termination of the participant's tenancy. Whether termination of tenancyis authorized depends on the program involved. In some cases, terminationof assistance would also require that the family be evicted from the project(see, for example, the Public and Indian Housing programs). In others, such as the tenant-based Certificate and Housing Voucher programs,assistance can be terminated without terminating the participant's tenancy:the participant simply pays an unsubsidized rental. In still others, failureto meet the proposed rules signing of consent form requirements not onlycould result in termination of assistance, but also would specificallybe made a substantial violation of the lease for which termination of tenancyis the appropriate remedy (see, for example, the Section 8 New Constructionand Substantial Rehabilitation programs, as amended by this proposed rule).Readers should carefully review the program-specific amendments to thisrule, as well as existing regulatory and administrative guidance for theexisting programs, to determine the effects of the proposed rule. J. Privacy Act Protections The collection, maintenance, use, and dissemination of information obtainedpursuant to this rule may be subject to the requirements of the PrivacyAct of 1974, 5 U.S.C. 552a. See andSection; 760.20 and andSection; 200.1220.The provisions of the Privacy Act apply to records on individual U.S. citizens(or aliens lawfully admitted for permanent residence) that are maintainedby HUD in a ``system of records'' whereby information is retrieved by thename of the individual or other identifying number or symbol. Records concerningapplicants and participants in most of the housing programs listed in part760 are maintained in Privacy Act systems of records. (a complete listingof the Department's Privacy Act systems is published in the <T4>Federal Register's</T4> Privacy Act Issuance: 1986 Compilation.) As noted above, HUD would collect employee income information and wageand claim information about applicants for, or participants in, HUD programs,for purposes of ensuring that they are income-eligible for the coveredprogram and that the level of benefits provided is appropriate. The incomeinformation would be used to decrease the incidence of fraud, waste, andabuse in HUD programs. HUD may disclose information obtained pursuant to this rule and maintainedin Privacy Act systems of records only as permitted by the Privacy Actand section 904 of the McKinney Amendments. In general, the informationmay be disclosed outside the agency to facilitate the administration ofthe applicable program. (However, as discussed later, this rule would providespecific limitations on the collection, use, and dissemination of wageand claim information.) Permissible routine uses of the information subjectto the Privacy Act are listed in the individual Privacy Act notices foreach system of records published by the <T4>Federal Register</T4> in its Privacy Act Issuances: 1986 Compilation.Requests for information not contained in a Privacy Act system of recordswill be governed by the Freedom of Information Act, 5 U.S.C. 552 (FOIA).FOIA permits HUD to withhold information concerning individuals where disclosurewould constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy. For the most part, the Privacy Act applies only to Federal agencies, anddoes not govern the collection, maintenance, use, or disclosure of informationby the processing entity or by other entities or persons. The rule wouldmake it clear that employee income and wage and claim information is subjectto all applicable Federal, State and local laws. State and local laws concerningthe protection of personal privacy may restrict the use of employee incomeinformation obtained from current or previous employers and wage and claiminformation obtained from SWICAs. HUD would not be responsible for the further use of employee income informationand wage and claim information that has been properly disclosed outsidethe Department. However, the requirements of the Privacy Act are applicableto other Federal agencies that may receive the employee income informationand wage and claim information from HUD, and that maintain the informationin a Privacy Act system of records. This rule would also provide specific additional limitations on the useof wage and claim information obtained from a SWICA. The rule would alsoprovide criminal penalties for the wrongful collection and use of the wageand claim information, and also provide civil penalties for certain negligentor knowing actions concerning wage and claim information and employee incomeinformation. These limitations and penalties are discussed in the followingsections. K. Request for Wage and Claim Information from SWICAs and Restrictionson the Use of the Information Section 904 explicitly permits HUD to require applicants for and participantsin HUD programs to sign consent forms authorizing HUD or the PHA to requestwage and claim information from a SWICA. The signed consent forms wouldbe physically maintained by the processing entity. Congress also prescribedcertain restrictions on the collection and use of the wage and claim information.The information which could be obtained from SWICAs would be limited towage and claim information. See andSection; 200.1225 and andSection; 760.25.The Secretary of Labor would prescribe how often and in what form wageand claim information would be obtained from a SWICA. It is anticipated that HUD and PHAs will obtain wage and claim informationfrom SWICAs subject to individual computer matching agreements betweenthe parties. Computer matching is a term used to describe the automatedcomparison of data bases containing records about individuals. Computermatching agreements would describe the responsibilities and obligationsof the parties to an agreement regarding the computer match. After July19, 1989, computer matches in which HUD participates will be conductedin conformance with the requirements of the Computer Matching and PrivacyProtection Act of 1988.Under this rule, a PHA could enter into a computer matching agreement toobtain wage and claim information with a SWICA separately from HUD or requestHUD to perform the PHA's match request. If the PHA wants to perform thematch itself, it must submit the proposed matching agreement with the SWICAto HUD for review and approval. This is to ensure that matching agreementsare in compliance with this part and the Department of Labor regulations,and are not burdensome on the SWICAs. The matching agreements would specify,among other things, the purpose and legal authority for the match, a descriptionof the records to be matched, a statement regarding disposition of informationgenerated through the match, a description of the administrative and technicalsafeguards to be used in protecting the information obtained through thematch, a description of the use of the records, duplication and redisclosurerestrictions, and the amount a SWICA will charge HUD or a PHA for processinga request. The Office of the Inspector General (IG) at HUD would be responsible forcoordinating initial implementation of computer matches under the regulation.The IG intends to encourage groups of PHAs or individual PHAs who havethe capacity to perform computer matches to enter into computer matchingagreements with SWICAs. Computer matches subject to these agreements couldtake several forms. For example, some States are willing to allow PHAson-line access to their SWICA's wage and claim databases. Subject to anyrestrictions established by the Department of Labor, these PHAs could performfront-end verification by checking the income of an applicant before heor she becomes a tenant by matching the applicant's Social Security Numberwith the SWICA's wage and claim database. These PHAs could also verifya participant's wage and claim information in this manner. PHAs, without on-line access but with computer matching capability, wouldalso be encouraged to enter into computer matching agreements with SWICAs.The IG would be available to provide technical assistance. PHAs withoutthe capability to handle computer matching could request HUD to performthe computer match for them. The IG would be responsible for determininghow and when these matches would be performed. In these case, PHAs wouldbe expected to provide the IG with a computer tape or diskette containingall relevant applicant and participant data, including social securitynumbers. The IG would code the social security numbers onto a separatedisk and send it to a SWICA for the computer match. Once a match is completed,the IG would compare the data received from the SWICA with the applicantand participant data received from the PHA. No PHA would be required toperform a computer match itself. PHAs which currently receive wage and claim information from SWICAs inless formal ways, such as by individual written request or telephone call,would not be prohibited from continuing these practices. However, <T3>all </T3>collection and use of wage and claim information by PHAs fromSWICAs would be subject to the Department of Labor regulations and therestrictions and penalties of this part. In the case of owners where there is no PHA operating as a section 8 contractadministrator, the IG would be responsible for establishing computer matchingagreements with SWICAs. The IG would also be responsible for accomplishingindependent verification with regard to such owners. HUD and PHAs would only be able to use wage and claim information obtainedfrom a SWICA (1) to verify an applicant's or participant's eligibilityfor or level of benefits; or (2) to inform the owner that an applicant'sor participant's eligibility for or level of benefits is uncertain andneeds to be verified. Verification would include the procedures for independentverification discussed in the next section. Neither HUD nor a PHA wouldbe permitted to disclose wage and claim information obtained from a SWICAto an owner. L. Procedures for Termination, Denial, Suspension, or Reduction of Benefitsbased on Information Obtained from a SWICA Section 200.1230 and andSection; 760.30 would permit a Federal, State, orlocal agency, a PHA, or an owner, as applicable, to terminate, deny, suspend,or reduce any benefits of an applicant or participant based on wage andclaim information obtained from a SWICA by HUD or a PHA if (1) the agencytakes steps to independently verify wage and claim information relatingto (i) the amount of wages or unemployment compensation involved, (ii)whether the applicant or participant actually has (or had) access to thewages or benefits for his or her own use; and (iii) the period or periodswhen or with respect to which the applicant or participant actually receivedthe wages or benefits; and (2) the applicant or participant has been givenan opportunity to contest any adverse findings. The regulation would notpermit an owner to perform independent verification of wage and claim datasince section 904 prohibits HUD or a PHA from disclosing wage and claiminformation to an owner. Moreover, section 552a(p)(1) of title 5, U.S.C.,as added by the Computer Matching and Privacy Protection Act of 1988, requiresthat ``an officer or employee'' of the Federal agency or non-Federal agencyinvolved to independently verify information obtained through a computermatch which may be used as the basis for an adverse determination involvingthe individual. The rule would establish separate procedures to meet the requirements ofindependent verification depending on whether HUD or a PHA is responsiblefor determining an applicant's or participant's eligibility for or levelof benefits or whether an owner has that responsibility. Where a PHA is responsible for determining an applicant's or participant'seligibility for or level of benefits in a covered program, HUD or the PHAwould compare the information received from a SWICA with information abouta family's income which is obtained from the applicant or participant orfrom his or her employer. HUD would compare the information where it hasperformed the computer match; PHAs would compare the information wherethey have performed the match. A ``hit'' occurs where the wage and claiminformation reveals an employer that was not disclosed by the applicantor participant or where the wage and claim information differs from informationreceived from the applicant or participant or from his or her employer.HUD or the PHA would request the undisclosed employer or other employerdisclosed by the ``hit'' to furnish, in writing to HUD or the PHA, anyinformation HUD or the PHA determines to be necessary to establish an applicant'sor participant's eligibility for or level of benefits in a covered program.(In most cases, the employer request letter would ask the employer to providethe information to the responsible PHA.) HUD or the PHA would not be expectedto pursue these verification procedures where the sums of money at issueare too small to raise an inference of fraud or justify the expense ofindependent verification and the procedures related to termination, denial,suspension, or reduction of benefits. Neither HUD nor a PHA would be permittedto disclose wage and claim information obtained from a SWICA to an owner.Where an owner is responsible for determining an applicant's or participant'seligibility for or level of benefits in a covered program, HUD or a PHA,as the section 8 contract administrator, would be responsible for requestingwage and claim information from a SWICA. Where there is no PHA involvedas contract administrator, HUD would be solely responsible for requestingwage and claim information from a SWICA. Upon receiving the wage and claiminformation, HUD or the PHA, as applicable, would compare the informationwith the information about a family's income obtained by the owner fromthe applicant or participant or from his or her employer. Where the wageand claim information reveals a ``hit,'' HUD or the PHA would request theundisclosed employer or other employer to furnish, in writing to the owner,any information that HUD or the PHA determines to be necessary for purposesof having the owner redetermine an applicant's or participant's eligibilityfor or level of benefits in the covered program. Again, HUD or the PHAwould not be expected to pursue these verification procedures where thesums of money at issue are too small to raise an inference of fraud orjustify the expense of independent verification and the procedures relatedto termination, denial, suspension, or reduction of benefits. HUD or thePHA could not directly disclose to the owner wage and claim informationreceived from a SWICA. HUD or the PHA could inform an owner that an applicant's or participant'seligibility for or level of benefits is uncertain and needs to be verified.The owner would then reverify the applicant's or participant's income informationby checking the accuracy of the information with the employer or directlywith the family. However, before any benefits could be terminated, denied,suspended, or reduced, HUD or the PHA would have to independently verifythe wage and claim information obtained from a SWICA. Neither HUD nor aPHA would be permitted to disclose wage and claim information obtainedfrom a SWICA to any owner. In addition, HUD or the PHA would be able to independently verify wageand claim information obtained from a SWICA by checking the accuracy ofinformation with the applicant or participant directly in cases where verificationcannot be obtained from any other source. Before any benefits could be terminated, denied, suspended, or reduced,HUD, PHAs and owners would be required to promptly notify any applicantor participant in writing of any adverse findings determined on the basisof the independent verification of the wage and claim information. Theapplicant or participant would then be given an opportunity to contestthe findings in the same manner as applies to other information and findingsrelating to eligibility factors under the applicable programs. Termination,denial, suspension, or reduction of benefits shall be determined accordingto the standards, including income standards, applicable to each coveredprogram. Readers should review the requirements of specific programs formore information. M. Criminal and Civil Penalties Sections 200.1235 and 760.35 would set forth criminal and civil penaltiesfor certain wrongful or negligent actions under this part. As for criminal penalties, this section would provide that any person whoknowingly and willfully requests or obtains under false pretenses any wageand claim information concerning an applicant or participant from a SWICApursuant to this part, or who knowingly and willfully discloses any suchinformation in any manner to any individual not entitled under any lawto receive it, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not more than$5,000. The term ``person'' for purposes of this section would includean officer or employee of HUD, an officer or employee of any PHA, and anyowner (or employee of an owner) responsible for determining eligibilityfor or level of benefits. In the case of civil penalties, any applicant or participant affected by(1) a negligent or knowing disclosure of information referred to in section904 of the McKinney Amendments or section 303(i) of the Social SecurityAct about such person by an officer or employee of any PHA or owner (oremployee of an owner), which disclosure is not authorized by section 904,section 303(i), or any implementing regulation, or (2) any other negligentor knowing action that is inconsistent with section 904, section 303(i),or any implementing regulation may bring a civil action for damages andsuch other relief as may be appropriate against any officer or employeeof any PHA or owner (or employee of an owner) responsible for the unauthorizedaction. Jurisdiction of such a case would be in the applicable United StatesDistrict Court for the district in which the affected applicant or participantresides, in which the unauthorized action occurred, or in which the applicantor participant alleged to be responsible for the unauthorized action resides.(This last grant of jurisdiction appears to be a mistake on the part ofthe draftors of section 904. What was probably intended was to providejurisdiction to the U.S. District Court for the district where an individualalleged to be responsible for the unauthorized action resides. The proposedregulation, however, follows the statutory language.) Appropriate reliefthat may be ordered by the district court would include reasonable attorney'sfees and other litigation costs. These civil penalties would apply to certainactions with regard to both employee income information and wage and claiminformation. However, section 904 does not provide any restrictions onthe use of employee income information. Nor does it describe unauthorizeddisclosure or inconsistent use of such information. Consequently, any lawfuluse of this information is authorized use and should be considered consistentwith section 904 and this part. Lawful use is any use of employee incomeinformation determined by HUD, PHAs, or owners to be necessary for determiningeligibility for or level of benefits and not prohibited by any Federalor State law.N. Federal Preemption of State Privacy Acts The doctrine of Federal preemption of State law recently summarized bythe United States Supreme Court, as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">It is familiar and well-established principle that the Supremacy Clause,U.S. Const., Art. VI, cl.2, invalidates state laws that ``interfere with,or are contrary to'' federal law. <T3>Gibbons </T3>v. <T3>Ogden, </T3>9 Wheat I, 211 (1824) (Marshall, C.J.). Under the SupremacyClause, Federal law may supersede state law in several different ways.First, when acting within constitutional limits, Congress is empoweredto preempt state law by so stating in express terms. <T3>Jones </T3>v. <T3>Rath Packing Co., </T3>430 U.S. 519, 525 (1977). In the absence ofexpress preemptive language, Congress' intent to pre-empt all state lawin a particular area may be inferred where the scheme of Federal regulationis sufficiently comprehensive to make reasonable the inference that Congress``left no room'' for supplementary state regulation. <T3>Rice </T3>v. <T3>Santa Fe Elevator Corp., </T3>331 U.S. 218, 230 (1947). Pre-emptionof a whole field also will be inferred where the field is one in which``the Federal interest is so dominant that the Federal system will be assumedto preclude enforcement of state laws on the same subject.'' <T3>Ibid; </T3>see <T3>Hines </T3>v. <T3>Davidowitz, </T3>312 U.S. 52 (1941). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Even where Congress has not completely displaced state regulationin a specific area, state law is nullified to the extent that it actuallyconflicts with Federal law. Such a conflict arises when ``compliance withboth Federal and state regulations is a physical impossibility,'' <T3>Federal Lime andamp; Avocado Growers, Inc. </T3>v. <T3>Paul, </T3>373 U.S. 132, 142-143 (1963), or when State law ``standsas an obstacle to the accomplishment and execution of the full purposesand objectives of Congress,'' <T3>Hines </T3>v. <T3>Davidowitz, supra </T3>at 67. (<T3>Hillsborough County, Florida </T3>v. <T3>Automated Medical Laboratories, Inc., </T3>471 U.S. 707, 712-13 (1985)).</ITAG>Under section 4 of Executive Order 12612, <T3>Federalism, </T3>HUD will construe a Federal statute to preempt Statelaw only when (1) the Federal statute in question contains an express preemptionprovision; (2) there is some other firm and palpable evidence compellingthe conclusion that the Congress intended preemption of State law; or (3)the exercise of State authority directly conflicts with the exercise ofFederal authority under the statute. (<T3>See </T3>Implementation of Executive Order 12612, <T3>Federalism, </T3>53 FR 31926 (August 22, 1988).) Section 904 of the McKinney Amendments provides explicit Federal authoritywith regard to the collection and use of employee income information andwage and claim information by HUD and PHAs. However, certain State privacyacts limit the ability of HUD and PHAs to collect wage and claim informationfrom SWICAs. Although section 904 does not contain an express preemptionprovision, it is clearly intended to preempt these State privacy acts underthe two other tests noted above. Under the ``firm and palpable'' evidence test, the Department will inferpreemption where (1) the scheme of Federal regulation is sufficiently comprehensiveto provide firm and palpable evidence that Congress intended to leave noroom for State regulation, or (2) the field is one in which the Federalinterest is sufficiently dominant to provide firm and palpable evidencethat Congress intended to preclude enforcement of State laws on the samesubject. Here, the Federal interest is sufficiently dominant to providefirm and palpable evidence that Congress intended to preclude the enforcementof State privacy acts which interfere with the collection of wage and claiminformation from SWICAs by HUD and PHAs. Section 904 of the McKinney Amendmentsgives the Federal government a paramount interest in the collection andreview by HUD and PHAs of wage and claim information about applicants andparticipants in HUD programs. Section 904's stated purposes are to ensurethat scarce Federal housing assistance is being provided in the correctamounts to the beneficiaries for which it is intended, and to help decreasethe incidence of fraud, waste, and abuse in these programs. Thus, section 904 provides compelling evidence that its purposes are tobe achieved without interference from State law. State privacy acts mustalso give way to section 904 under the ``direct conflict'' test, describedabove. The Department cannot carry out its responsibilities under section904 if State privacy acts prevent HUD and PHAs from obtaining the wageand claim information called for under that provision. Section 904, therefore, preempts any State privacy acts, including restrictionsand penalties provided in the acts, to the extent they prohibit the releaseof wage and claim information to HUD or a PHA or otherwise conflict withsection 904. The proposed regulation has been carefully reviewed to ensure that theextent of preemption is the minimum necessary to accomplish the goals ofsection 904 in the collection of wage and claim information. Affected officialsand organizations should carefully review the proposed regulation as tothe effect and the extent of Federal preemption under it. The proposed rule does not attempt to preempt any Indian tribal law since,in almost all cases, wage and claim information as it relates to membersof Indian tribes is covered by State law. O. Effective Date For applicants, the proposed rule would apply to all applicant eligibilitydeterminations initiated on or after the date HUD established as the effectivedate of the rule, which can be no earlier than September 30, 1989. Forparticipants, the rule would apply to each regularly scheduled review ofparticipant income initiated on or after the effective date as establishedby HUD, and to each future review. Section 904 also gives a State or an agency of a State, with the approvalof the Secretary of Labor, the option of implementing the provisions governingthe collection of wage and claim information on any date which is afterFebruary 5, 1989 (90 days after November 7, 1988, the date of enactmentof the McKinney Amendments) but before September 30, 1989. In the caseof any State in which the legislature has not been in session for at least30 calendar days (whether or not consecutive) between November 7, 1988and September 30, 1989, the provisions authorizing the obtaining of informationfrom a SWICA would take effect 30 calendar days after the first day onwhich the legislature is in session on or after September 30, 1989. Thisrule would not address these provisions. We believe that certain of section904's provisions are too complex to be implemented before the regulationis made effective and that the effective date of the regulation will beno earlier than September 30, 1989. Moreover, as of the effective dateof the regulation, all State legislatures will have been in session therequired length of time. P. Indian Housing Authorities For purposes of brevity, this rule encompasses Indian Housing authorizedby title II of the 1937 Act under proposed 24 CFR part 760, and providesthat PHAs include Indian Housing Authorities. On June 29, 1988, President Reagan signed into law the Indian Housing Actof 1988 (Indian Housing Act) (Pub. L. 100-358), which created a separatetitle for Indian Housing under title II of the 1937 Act. Section 201(b)(2)of the Indian Housing Act requires that any provision modifying the publichousing program under title I of the 1937 Act must explicitly apply tothe Indian Public Housing Program if it is to cover that program. The McKinneyAmendments was enacted on November 7, 1988 and is subject to the requirementsof the Indian Housing Act. Although the McKinney Amendments modifies thepublic housing program, HUD believes that section 904 of the McKinney Amendmentsdoes not come within coverage of the Indian Housing Act exclusion becauseit is not a law which specifically modifies the public housing programunder title I of the 1937 Act. Section 904 is general legislation modifyingall HUD programs, including title I. The requirements of section 904 would,therefore, be applicable to Indian Public Housing Program. HUD has published a proposed rule to consolidate all Indian Housing regulationsfrom 24 CFR Chapter IX into a revamped part 905. When this rule is madefinal, appropriate amendments will be inserted in the appropriate placein the reconstituted part 905.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Findings and Certifications </ITAG><T3>Environment. </T3>A Finding of No Significant Impact with respect tothe environment has been made in accordance with HUD regulations at 24CFR Part 50, which implement section 102(2)(C) of the National EnvironmentalPolicy Act of 1969. The Finding of No Significant Impact is available forpublic inspection during regular business hours (7:30 a.m. to 5:00 p.m.weekdays) in the Office of the Rules Docket Clerk, Office of the GeneralCounsel, Department of Housing and Urban Development, Room 10276, 451 SeventhStreet, SW., Washington, DC 20410. <T3>Major rule. </T3>This rule would not constitute a ``major rule'' asthat term is defined in section 1(d) of the Executive Order on FederalRegulations issued by the President on February 17, 1981. An analysis ofthe rule indicates that it would not (1) have an annual effect on the economyof $100 million or more; (2) cause a major increase in costs or pricesfor consumers, individual industries, Federal, State, or local governmentagencies, or geographic regions; or (3) have a significant adverse effecton competition, employment, investment, productivity, innovation, or onthe ability of United States-based enterprises to compete with foreign-basedenterprises in domestic or export markets. <T3>Regulatory Flexibility Act. </T3>In accordance with 5 U.S.C. 605(b)(the Regulatory Flexibility Act), the undersigned hereby certifies thatthis rule does not have a significant economic impact on a substantialnumber of small entities. The rule would require applicants and participantsin certain HUD programs to sign consent forms permitting (1) HUD, the PHA,or the owner to verify employee income information, and (2) HUD or thePHA to request wage and claim information from a SWICA. The costs of complyingwith this requirement and collection of the information would be slightsince verification of family income is already required. <T3>Executive Order 12612, Federalism. </T3>The General Counsel, as theDesignated Official under section 6(a) of Executive Order 12612, <T3>Federalism, </T3>has determined that the policies contained in thisrule would not (if implemented) have federalism implications and, thus,are not subject to review under the Order. Although section 904 preemptscertain State privacy acts which interfere with the ability of HUD andPHAs to collect wage and claim information about applicants and participantsin HUD programs from SWICAs, the extent of the preemption is the minimumnecessary to accomplish the goals of section 904 in the collection of theinformation. A full discussion of Federal preemption of State privacy actsby section 904 can be found under paragraph N. of the preamble. Moreover,the only entities subject to the rule that are covered by the Order arePHAs and SWICAs. PHAs would be affected in their role as ``processing entities.''Since PHAs already perform significant functions in this role with respectto providing HUD assistance to applicants and participants, the additionalburden of requiring applicants and participants to sign consent forms andof collecting information pursuant to the consent would appear to be insubstantial.SWICAs would be required to provide wage and claim information to HUD andPHAs. Since HUD anticipates the information will be collected through acomputer matching program, the burden on the SWICAs should be small. SWICAswould also be reimbursed for this activity. <T3>Executive Order 12606, the Family. </T3>The General Counsel, as theDesignated Official under Executive Order 12606, <T3>the Family, </T3>has determined that this rule does not have potentialfor significant impact on family formation, maintenance, and general well-being,and, thus, is not subject to review under the Order. Applicants and participants,and members of their families, would be required to sign consent formsauthorizing the verification or collection of certain information necessaryfor determining eligibility for or level of benefits under the coveredprograms. Consent forms to permit verification of information providedby the family are already required. This rule would add an insignificantadditional burden for applicants and participants, and will help ensurethat scarce housing assistance will be targeted to the truly needy. <T3>Semiannual agenda of regulations. </T3>This rule was listed as itemnumber 900 in the Department's Semiannual Agenda of Regulations publishedon April 24, 1989 (54 FR 16708, 16709) pursuant to Executive Order 12291and the Regulatory Flexibility Act.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance. </T3>The catalog of FederalDomestic Assistance program numbers are 14.103, 14.135, 14.137, 14.149,14.156, 14.157, 14.177, 14.850, 14.851, and 14.852.</ITAG><T3>Information collection requirements. </T3>The collection of informationrequirements contained in this rule have been submitted to OMB for reviewunder section 3504(h) of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980. Virtuallyall of the sections of this proposed rule have been determined by the Departmentto contain collection of information requirements. Information on theserequirements is provided as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Tabulation of Annual Reporting Burden \1\ Income Verification Proceduresfor Applicants and Participants in HUD Programs </T4><H1>Description of information collection response </H1><H1>Section of 24 CFR affected hours </H1><H1>Number of respondents </H1><H1>Number of responses per respondent </H1><H1>Total annual </H1><H1>Hours per responses </H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Consent form allowing: (1) HUD or Public Housing Authority (PHA) orowner to verify employee income information with previous or current employees;(2) HUD or the PHA to request wage and claim information from the StateWage agency responsible for the administration of the State UnemploymentLaw State Wage Information Collection Agency (SWICA) (2502-0204) <D>200, 215, 221, 226, 247, 290, 760, 883, 884, 885, 886 </D><D>2,171,256 </D><D>4 </D><D>8,685,024 </D><D>.016 </D><D>138,960</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Consent form allowing: (1) HUD or PHA or owner to verify employee incomeinformation with previous or current employers; (2) HUD or the PHA to requestwage and claim information from State Wage Agency responsible for the administrationof the State Unemployment Law (SWICA) (2577-0083) <D>760, 813, 882, 887, 900, 904, 905, 913, 960 </D><D>2,640,000 </D><D>4 </D><D>10,560,000 </D><D>.016 </D><D>168,960</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">OIG request for SWICA to provide wage and claim information (includescomputer match agreement and running magnetic tape against State Wage database)<D> </D><D>53 </D><D>1 </D><D>53 </D><D>16 </D><D>848 </D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total annual burden <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>308,768</D><F>\1\ The annual reporting burden for OMB clearance numbers (2502-0204)and (2577-0083) on this table was included in the calculation of annualburden at the most recent approval of each and therefore does not representan increase in the HUD information collection inventory. </F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>24 CFR Part 200 Administrative practice and procedure, Claims, Housing standards, Loanprograms: housing and community development, Mortgage insurance, Organizationand functions (Government agencies), Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Minimum property standards, Incorporation by reference. 24 CFR Part 215 Grant programs: housing and community development, Rent subsidies. 24 CFR Part 221 Condominiums, Low and moderate income housing, Mortgage insurance, Displacedfamilies, Single family housing, Projects, Cooperatives. 24 CFR Part 236 Low and moderate income housing, Mortgage insurance, Rent subsidies, Taxes,Utilities, Projects. 24 CFR Part 247 Low and moderate income housing, Public housing, Tenant eviction.24 CFR Part 290Mortgage insurance, Low and moderate income housing. 24 CFR Part 760 Certain housing assistance programs, Income verification procedures. 24 CFR Part 813 Low and moderate income housing. 24 CFR Part 880 Grant programs: housing and community development, Rent subsidies, Lowand moderate income housing, New construction. 24 CFR Part 881 Grant programs: housing and community development, Rent subsidies, Lowand moderate income housing. 24 CFR Part 882 Grant programs: housing and community development, Housing, Mobile homes,Rent subsidies, Low and moderate income housing. 24 CFR Part 883 Grant programs: housing and community development, Rent subsidies, Newconstruction and substantial rehabilitation, Low and moderate income housing.24 CFR Part 884 Grant programs: housing and community development, Rent subsidies, Ruralareas, Low and moderate income housing. 24 CFR Part 885 Grant programs: housing and community development, Aged, Handicapped, Loanprograms: housing and community development. 24 CFR Part 886 Grant programs: housing and community development, Low and moderate incomehousing, Rent subsidies. 24 CFR Part 887 Grant programs: Housing and community development, Housing, Rent subsidies,Low and moderate income housing. 24 CFR Part 900 Housing assistance payments: new construction and substantial rehabilitation,Guaranteed/insured loans. 24 CFR Part 904 Grant programs: housing and community development, Loan programs: housingand community development, Low and moderate income housing, Public housing,Homeownership. 24 CFR Part 905 Grant programs: housing and community development, Grant programs: Indians,Indian Housing, Loan programs: Indians, Low and moderate income housing,Public housing, Homeownership. 24 CFR Part 913 Public housing, Indian housing. 24 CFR Part 960 Public housing.Accordingly, 24 CFR Parts 200, 215, 221, 236, 247, 290, 813, 880, 881,882, 883, 884, 885, 886, 887, 900, 904, 905, 913, and 960 would be amended,and new 24 CFR part 760 would be added, to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 200_INTRODUCTION </ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 200 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Titles I, II, National Housing Act (12 U.S.C. 1701-1715z-18);sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (12 U.S.C. 3535(d)).Subpart V is also issued under sec. 904 of the Stewart B. McKinney HomelessAssistance Amendments Act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. 3544), sec. 101, Housing andUrban Development Act of 1965 (12 U.S.C. 1701s), and sec. 203, Housingand Community Development Amendments of 1978 (12 U.S.C. 1715z-11).</ITAG>2. Part 200 is amended by adding new subpart V, to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart V_Income Verification Procedures for Applicants and Participantsin HUD's Assisted Mortgage and Loan Insurance and Related Programs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">200.1201 Summary, purpose, and Federal preemption. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">200.1203 Applicability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">200.1205 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">200.1210 Consent by applicants and participants. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">200.1215 Penalties for failing to sign consent forms. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">200.1220 Compliance with the Privacy Act and other requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">200.1225 Request for wage and claim information from SWICAs and restrictionson the use of the information. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">200.1230 Procedures for termination, denial, suspension, or reductionof benefits based on information obtained from a SWICA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">200.1235 Criminal and civil penalties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">200.1240 Implementation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 200.1201 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Summary, purpose, and Federal preemption. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Summary. </T3>(1) This part implements section 904 of the Stewart B. McKinney HomelessAssistance Amendments Act of 1988 (``McKinney Amendments'') as it pertainsto the assisted mortgage and loan insurance and related programs administeredby the Department of Housing and Urban Development under Subchapter B ofthis Chapter. The programs covered by this subpart include the following:Rent Supplements under 24 CFR part 215; management of HUD-acquired multifamilyproperties under 24 CFR part 290; and the rental assistance programs undersections 221(d)(3)(BMIR) and 236 of the National Housing Act. Section 904is implemented for most of the housing assistance programs administeredby HUD under 24 CFR Chapters VIII and IX, at 24 CFR part 760. (2) This part requires applicants and participants in the covered programsto sign consent forms authorizing: (i) HUD or the owner to verify employee income information; and (ii) HUD to request a SWICA to release wage and claim information. Thefailure of any person to sign these consent forms constitutes grounds fordenial of eligibility, or termination of assistance or tenancy (or both),for the covered program. (3) This part restricts the use of information received by HUD from a SWICAto (i) Verifying an applicant's or participant's eligibility for or levelof benefits; or (ii) Informing the owner that an applicant's or participant's eligibilityfor or level of benefits is uncertain and needs to be verified. This partprohibits termination, denial, suspension, or reduction of benefits withoutprior independent verification of wage and claim information obtained froma SWICA. The applicant or participant shall then be notified of any adversefindings and given an opportunity to contest them. (4) This part provides criminal and civil penalties for certain wrongfulor negligent actions under this part. (b) <T3>Purpose. </T3>The purpose of this part is to enable HUD to obtain employeeincome information and wage and claim information about applicants andparticipants in the covered programs in order to verify an applicant'sor participant's eligibility for or level of benefits and help decreasethe incidence of fraud, waste, and abuse in these programs. (c) <T3>Federal Preemption. </T3>This part preempts any State law, includingrestrictions and penalties, which governs the collection and use of employeeincome information and wage and claim information to the extent it is inconsistentwith this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 200.1203</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Applicability. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Information to be Covered by Consent Forms. </T3>The information coveredby consent forms described in this part involves employee income informationand wage and claim information from a SWICA. In addition, consent formsmay authorize the collection of other information, including informationwhich can be obtained under other laws, regulations, and handbooks. (b) <T3>Programs Covered. </T3>This part applies to the following housing assistanceprograms contained in subchapter B of this Chapter: (1) Part 215, Rent Supplement Payments. (2) Part 221, Low Cost and Moderate Income Mortgage Insurance (BMIR). (3) Part 236, Mortgage Insurance and Interest Reduction Payments for RentalProjects. (4) Part 290, Management and Disposition of HUD-Owned Multifamily HousingProjects. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 200.1205 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>As used in this part: <T3>Applicant </T3>has the following meaning for the programs referredto in andSection; 200.1203: An individual or family that seeks assistanceunder 24 CFR part 215, 221 (BMIR), 236, or 290. <T3>Claim information </T3>means information regarding: (a) Whether an individual is receiving, has received, or has applied forunemployment compensation; (b) The amount of compensation the individual is receiving or is entitledto receive; and (c) The period or periods when, or with respect to which, the individualactually received such compensation. <T3>Consent form </T3>means a consent form or forms approved by HUD tobe signed by applicants and participants for the purpose of obtaining employeeincome information from employers and wage and claim information from aSWICA or other information which can be obtained under other laws, regulationsand handbooks. <T3>Employee income information </T3>means all the information known tocurrent or previous employers which HUD or the processing entity determinesis necessary for purposes of determining an applicant's or participant'seligibility for or level of benefits in a covered program. <T3>HUD </T3>means the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.<T3>Owner </T3>means the person or entity (or employee of an owner) thatleases an assisted dwelling unit to an eligible family. <T3>Participant </T3>has the following meaning for the programs referredto in andSection; 200.1203: A tenant or a qualified tenant under 24 CFR part215, 221 (BMIR), 236, or 290. <T3>Processing entity </T3>means the person or entity that is responsiblefor making eligibility determinations and any interim or regularly scheduledincome reexaminations under any of the programs referred to in andSection;200.1203. <T3>Scheduled income reexamination </T3>has the following meaning for theprograms referred to in andSection; 200.1203. (a) <T3>Parts 215, 221(BMIR), and 236: </T3>The regularly scheduled reexaminationof participant income. (b) <T3>Part 290: </T3>Income certification as provided by andSection; 290.17(e).<T3>State Wage Information Collection Agency (SWICA) </T3>means the SWICAreceiving quarterly wage reports from employers in the State (which maybe the agency administering the State's unemployment compensation program),or an alternative system which has been determined by the Secretary ofLabor to be as effective and timely in providing employment related incomeand eligibility information. <T3>Wage information </T3>means information about wages as defined in theState's unemployment compensation law and includes the Social SecurityNumber (or numbers, if more than one) and quarterly wages of an employee,and the name, address, State, and (when known) Federal employer identificationnumber of an employer reporting wages under a State unemployment compensationlaw. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 200.1210 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Consent by applicants and participants. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Required consent by applicants and participants.</T3> The followingindividuals shall sign consent forms authorizing HUD or the owner to verifyemployee income information, and HUD to request a SWICA to release wageand claim information: (1) Each applicant under a program referred to in andSection; 200.1203, includingeach family head and spouse regardless of age, and every other member ofthe household of the applicant who is at least 18 years of age; and (2) Each participant in a program referred to in andSection; 200.1203, includingeach family head and spouse regardless of age, and every other member ofthe participant's household who is at least 18 years of age. (b) <T3>Consent authorization: To whom and when_ </T3>(1) Consent by applicants. Applicants shall sign the consent forms andsubmit them to the processing entity when their eligibility under a programreferred to in andSection; 200.1203 is being determined. Applicants shallbe responsible for the signing and submitting of consent forms by membersof their household. (2) Initial consent by participants. If participation for a program referredto in andSection; 200.1203 was initiated before the effective date of thepart, participants, including members of their family, shall sign and submitconsent forms at the next interim or regularly scheduled income reexamination.Participants shall be responsible for the signing and submitting of consentforms by members of their households. (3) Subsequent consent forms to be signed at each regularly scheduled incomereexamination by participants who have signed initial consent forms underthis section. Once a participant has submitted signed consent forms asan applicant or as a preexisting participant, subsequent consent formsare required to be signed and submitted at each regularly scheduled incomereexamination. (4) Subsequent consent forms to be signed at the next interim or regularlyscheduled income reexamination_special cases. Consent forms are requiredunder the following circumstances: (i) Where there has been a change in the composition of the participant'sfamily, any new member of the family shall sign and submit a consent format the next interim or regularly scheduled reexamination; (ii) When a member of a family turns 18 years of age, that member shallsign and submit a consent form at the next interim or regularly scheduledreexamination; and(iii) Such other circumstances as HUD may prescribe in administrative instructions.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 200.1215</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Penalties for failing to sign consent forms. </ITAG>(a)<T3> Denial of Eligibility. </T3>The processing entity shall deny the eligibilityof an applicant, in accordance with the provisions governing the programinvolved, if the applicant, or any member of the applicant's household,does not sign and submit the consent forms as required in andSection; 200.1210.(b)<T3> Termination of assistance or tenancy. </T3>It shall be consideredgrounds for termination of assistance, and (as provided by the individualprogram covered by this part) the tenancy of a participant, in accordancewith the provisions governing the program involved, if the participant,or any member of the participant's household, fails to sign and submitthe consent forms as required in andSection; 200.1210. (c)<T3> Cross references. </T3>Individuals should consult the regulationsand administrative instructions for the programs referred to in andSection;200.1203 for further information on the use of employee income informationand wage and claim information in determining the eligibility of applicantsand the continued eligibility of participants. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 200.1220 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Compliance with the Privacy Act and other requirements. </ITAG><T3>Compliance with the Privacy Act. </T3>The collection, maintenance,use, and dissemination of employee income information and wage and claiminformation under this part shall be conducted, to the extent applicable,in compliance with the Privacy Act (5 U.S.C. 552a) and all other provisionsof Federal, State, and local law. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 200.1225</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Request for wage and claim information from SWICAs and restrictionson the use of the information. </ITAG>(a)<T3> Information Available from SWICA_to whom and what. </T3>HUD may, aftersigned consent forms have been submitted to the processing entity by anapplicant or participant, request wage and claim information from a SWICA.Regulations prescribed by the Secretary of Labor govern how often and inwhat form information may be disclosed by a SWICA. (b) <T3>Restrictions on Use of Wage and Claim Information Obtained from SWICA.</T3>HUD may only use wage and claim information obtained from a SWICA:(1) To verify an applicant's or participant's eligibility for or levelof benefits; or (2) In the case of an owner, to inform the owner that an applicant's orparticipant's eligibility for or level of benefits is uncertain and needsto be verified. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 200.1230</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures for termination, denial, suspension, or reduction of benefitsbased on information obtained from a SWICA. </ITAG>(a)<T3> Termination, Denial, Suspension, or Reduction of Benefits. </T3>AFederal, State, or local agency or an owner may terminate, deny, suspend,or reduce any benefits of an applicant or participant based on wage andclaim information obtained from a SWICA if: (1) the agency has taken the steps contained in paragraph (b) of this sectionto independently verify wage and claim information relating to_ (i) The amount of the wages or unemployment compensation involved; (ii) Whether such applicant or participant actually has (or had) accessto such wages or benefits for his or her own use; and (iii) The period or periods when, or with respect to which, the applicantor participant actually received the wages or benefits; and (2) The applicant or participant has been given an opportunity to contestany adverse findings in accordance with paragraph (c) of this section.(b)<T3> Procedures for Independent Verification.</T3>_(1)<T3> Verification by HUD. </T3>Upon receiving wage and claim informationfrom a SWICA, HUD shall compare this information with the information abouta family's income obtained by the owner from the applicant or participantor from his or her employer. Where the wage and claim information revealsan employer that was not disclosed by the applicant or participant or wherethe wage and claim information differs from the information received fromthe applicant or participant or from his or her employer, HUD may requestthe undisclosed employer or other employer to furnish, in writing to theowner, any information HUD determines to be necessary for purposes of havingthe owner redetermine an applicant's or participant's eligibility for orlevel of benefits in a covered program. Based on the wage and claim information,HUD may inform an owner that an applicant's or participant's eligibilityfor or level of benefits is uncertain and needs to be verified. The ownershall then reverify the applicant's or participant's income informationby checking the accuracy of the information with the employer or directlywith the family. However, before any benefits are terminated, denied, suspended,or reduced, HUD shall independently verify the accuracy of the wage andclaim information obtained from a SWICA as described in this paragraph.HUD may not disclose wage and claim information directly to an owner. (2)<T3> Verification by Applicant or Participant. </T3>Where independent verificationcannot be obtained from any other source, HUD may independently verifywage and claim information obtained from a SWICA by checking the accuracyof the information with the applicant or participant directly. (c)<T3> Opportunity to Contest. </T3>HUD or the owner shall promptly notifyany applicant or participant, in writing, of any adverse findings madeon the basis of the information verified in accordance with paragraph (b)of this section. Termination, denial, suspension, or reduction of benefitsshall be determined according to the standards, including the income standards,applicable to the individual covered program. The applicant or participantshall be given an opportunity to contest the findings in the same manneras applies to other information and findings relating to eligibility factorsunder the applicable housing assistance program. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 200.1235</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criminal and civil penalties. </ITAG>(a)<T3> Criminal Penalties. </T3>Any person who knowingly and willfully requestsor obtains under false pretenses any wage and claim information concerningan applicant or participant from a SWICA pursuant to this part, or whoknowingly and willfully discloses any such information in any manner toany individual not entitled under any law to receive it, shall be guiltyof a misdemeanor and fined not more than $5,000. The term ``person'' forpurposes of this paragraph shall include an officer or employee of HUDand any owner (or employee of an owner) responsible for determining eligibilityfor or level of benefits. (b)<T3> Civil Penalties. </T3>Any applicant or participant affected by: (1) A negligent or knowing disclosure of information referred to in section904 of the McKinney Amendments or section 303(i) of the Social SecurityAct about such person by an officer or employee of any PHA or owner (oremployee of an owner), which disclosure is not authorized by section 904,section 303(i), or any implementing regulation, or (2) Any other negligent or knowing action that is inconsistent with section904, section 303(i), or any implementing regulation may bring a civil actionfor damages and such other relief as may be appropriate against any owner(or employee of an owner) responsible for any such unauthorized action.Authorized use of employee income information includes any use of the informationdetermined by HUD or an owner to be necessary for determining eligibilityfor or level of benefits in a covered program and not prohibited by anyFederal or State law. Jurisdiction of such a case is in the United Statesdistrict court in the district in which the affected applicant or participantresides, in which the unauthorized action occurred, or in which the applicantor participant alleged to be responsible for the unauthorized action resides.Appropriate relief that may be ordered by the district court shall includereasonable attorney fees and other litigation costs. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 200.1240</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Implementation. </ITAG>(a)<T3> Applicants. </T3>The provisions of this part, and the conforming changesmade with respect to consent forms in the regulations governing the programsreferred to in andSection; 200.1203 apply to all applicant eligibility determinationsinitiated on or after the effective date of this rule. (b)<T3> Participants. </T3>The provisions of this part and the conformingchanges made with respect to the execution of consent forms for participantsin the regulations governing the programs referred to in andSection; 200.1203apply to: (1) Each interim or regularly scheduled reexamination of the income ofa participant initiated by the processing entity on or after the effectivedate of this rule; and (2) Each such reexamination thereafter. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 215_RENT SUPPLEMENT PAYMENTS </ITAG>3. The authority citation for part 215 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sec. 101(g), Housing and Urban Development Act of 1965(12 U.S.C. 1701s); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban DevelopmentAct (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>4. In andSection; 215.20, paragraph (b)(2) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 215.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Qualified tenant. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (2) For requirements covering the disclosure and verification of SocialSecurity Numbers by individuals and families, see part 200, subpart T,of this chapter. For requirements covering the signing and submitting ofconsent forms by individuals and families, see part 200, subpart V, ofthis chapter. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>5. Section 215.55 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 215.55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Reexamination of family income and composition. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Regular reexaminations.</T3> The owner must reexamine the income andfamily composition of all Qualified Tenants at least once every 12 months.After consultation with the Qualified Tenant and upon verification of theinformation, the owner must make appropriate adjustments in the Total TenantPayment in accordance with andSection; 215.45 and determine whether the family'sunit size is still appropriate. The owner must adjust Tenant Rent and theRent Supplement payment to reflect any change in Total Tenant Payment andmust carry out any unit transfer required by HUD. At the time of the annualreexamination of family income and composition, the owner must requirethe Qualified Tenant to meet the disclosure and verification requirementsfor Social Security Numbers, as provided by part 200, subpart T of thischapter, and to sign and submit consent forms, as provided by part 200,subpart V, of this chapter. (b) <T3>Interim reexaminations.</T3> The Qualified Tenant must comply withprovisions in its lease regarding interim reporting of changes in incomeor family composition. If the owner receives information concerning a changein the Qualified Tenant's income or other circumstances between regularlyscheduled reexaminations, the owner must consult with the Qualified Tenantand make adjustments determined to be appropriate. Any change in the QualifiedTenant's income or other circumstances that would result in an adjustmentin the Total Tenant Payment, Tenant Rent, and the Rent Supplement Paymentmust be verified. At the time of the interim reexamination, the owner mustrequire the Qualified Tenant to sign and submit consent forms, as requiredby part 200, subpart V of this chapter. See 24 CFR 750.10(d)(2)(i) forthe requirements for the disclosure and verification of Social SecurityNumbers for interim reexaminations involving new family members. (c) <T3>Termination of assistance.</T3> A Qualified Tenant's eligibility forRent Supplement Payments continues until the Total Tenant Payment equalsthe Gross Rent. The rent charged at that point may not exceed the marketrent approved by the Secretary. The termination of eligibility at suchpoint will not affect the Qualified Tenant's other rights under its lease,nor will such termination preclude the resumption of payments as a resultof later changes in income, rents, or other relevant circumstances duringthe term of the contract. However, assistance also may be terminated inaccordance with any requirements of the lease or with HUD requirements,including the failure of the Qualified Tenant to meet the disclosure andverification requirements for Social Security Numbers, as provided by part200, subpart T of this chapter, and the failure of the Qualified Tenantto sign and submit consent forms, as provided by part 200, subpart V ofthis chapter. <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 221_LOW COST AND MODERATE INCOME MORTGAGE INSURANCE </ITAG>6. The authority citation for part 221 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 211, 221 National Housing Act (12 U.S.C. 1715b,1715<T3>l</T3>); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act(42 U.S.C. 3535(d)); sec. 221.544(a)(3) is also issued under sec. 201(a),National Housing Act (12 U.S.C. 1707(a)).</ITAG>7. In andSection; 221.537, a new paragraph (f) would be added, to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.537</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Additional occupancy requirements; preferred purchasers or tenants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) <T3>Signing of Consent Forms for Income Verification. </T3>Upon determiningan individual's or family's eligibility for initial occupancy under paragraph(a) of this section, and at any subsequent reexamination of a tenant'sincome for continued occupancy under paragraph (b) of this section, themortgagor must require the individual or family, or the tenant (as appropriate),to sign and submit consent forms as provided by part 200, subpart V, ofthis chapter. Failure of the individual or family, or the tenant (as appropriate),to meet such requirements will constitute grounds for denying its eligibilityfor initial occupancy, or for terminating its tenancy, in accordance withthe Commissioner's administrative instructions and, if applicable, part200, subpart V, of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 236_MORTGAGE INSURANCE AND INTEREST REDUCTION PAYMENT FOR RENTALPROJECTS </ITAG>8. The authority citation for part 236 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 211, 236, National Housing Act (12 U.S.C. 1715b,1715z-1); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>9. In andSection; 236.70, paragraph (a)(1) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 236.70</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Occupancy requirements. </ITAG>(a)(1) In processing applications for admission, the housing owner will(i) Establish to the satisfaction of the Commissioner that it qualifiesas a group practice unit, as that term is defined in 24 CFR 244.1(c); (ii) Meet the requirements for the disclosure and verification of SocialSecurity and Employer Identification Numbers, as provided by part 200,subpart U, of this chapter; and (iii) Meet the requirements for the signing and submitting of consent formsas provided by part 200, subpart V, of this chapter. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>10. Section 236.80 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 236.80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reexamination of income. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Regular reexaminations. </T3>The owner must reexamine the income andfamily composition of all Qualified Tenants at least once every 12 months.After consultation with the Qualified Tenant and upon verification of theinformation, the owner must make appropriate adjustments in the TenantRent (or Total Tenant Payment for tenants receiving the benefit of RentalAssistance Payments) in accordance with andSection; 236.55 or andSection; 236.735,and determine whether the Qualified Tenant's unit size is still appropriate.The owner must adjust Tenant Rent and the Rental Assistance Payment, ifapplicable, to reflect any change in Total Tenant Payment, and must carryout any unit transfer required by HUD. At the time of the annual reexaminationof family income and composition, the owner must require the family tosign and submit consent forms, as provided by part 200, subpart V, of thischapter. (b) <T3>Interim reexaminations. </T3>The Qualified Tenant must comply withprovisions in its lease regarding interim reporting of changes in incomeor family composition. If the owner receives information concerning a changein the Qualified Tenant's income or other circumstances between regularlyscheduled reexaminations, the owner must consult with the Qualified Tenantand make adjustments determined to be appropriate. Any change in the QualifiedTenant's income or other circumstances that would result in an adjustmentin the Rental Assistance Payment or Tenant Rent must be verified. At thetime of the interim reexamination, the owner must require the QualifiedTenant to sign and submit consent forms, as required by part 200, subpartV of this chapter. (c) <T3>Termination of assistance. </T3>A Qualified Tenant loses eligibilityfor assistance when the Tenant Rent (Total Tenant Payment for tenants receivingthe benefit of Rental Assistance Payments) equals the Basic Rent (GrossRent for RAP tenants). The termination of eligibility at such point willnot affect the Qualified Tenant's other rights under its lease, nor willsuch termination preclude the resumption of payments as a result of laterchanges in income, rents or other relevant circumstances during the termof the contract. However, assistance or eligibility to pay below MarketRent also may be terminated in accordance with any requirements of thelease or with HUD requirements, including failure to sign consent forms,as provided by part 200, subpart V, of this chapter. 11. Section 236.710 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 236.710</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Qualified tenant. </ITAG>The benefits of rental assistance payments are available only to an individualor a family renting a dwelling unit in a project that is subject to a contractunder this subpart or occupying such a dwelling unit as a cooperative member.To qualify for such benefits, the individual or family must satisfy thedefinition of Qualified Tenant found in andSection; 236.2 of subpart A. Inorder to receive rental assistance under this Subpart, it must have beendetermined that the income of the individual or family is too low to permitthe individual or family to pay the approved Gross Rent with 30 percentof such individual's or family's Adjusted Monthly Income, as defined insubpart A. For requirements concerning the signing and submitting of consentforms, see part 200, subpart V, of this chapter. <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 247_EVICTIONS FROM CERTAIN SUBSIDIZED AND HUD-OWNED PROJECTS</ITAG>12. The authority citation for Part 247 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 101, Housing and Urban Development Act of 1965(12 U.S.C. 1701s); secs. 211, 221, 236, National Housing Act (12 U.S.C.1715b, 1715<T3>l,</T3> 1715z-1); sec. 202, Housing Act of 1959 (12 U.S.C. 1701q);secs. 3, 5, 8, United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437a, 1437c,1437f); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>13. In andSection; 247.3, paragraph (c) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 247.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Entitlement of tenants to occupancy. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) <T3>Material noncompliance. </T3>The term ``material noncompliance withthe rental agreement'' includes: (1) One or more substantial violations of the rental agreement; (2) Repeated minor violations of the rental agreement that: (i) Disrupt the livability of the project, (ii) Adversely affect the health or safety of any person or the right ofany tenant to the quiet enjoyment of the leased premises and related projectfacilities, (iii) Interfere with the management of the project, or (iv) Have an adverse financial effect on the project; (3) Failure of the tenant to timely supply all required information onthe income and composition, or eligibility factors, of the tenant household(including failure to meet the disclosure and verification requirementsfor Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 200, subpart T,or 24 CFR part 750 (as appropriate), or failure to sign and submit consentforms, as provided by 24 CFR part 200, subpart V, or 24 CFR part 760 (asappropriate)) will constitute a substantial violation of the rental agreement;and (4) Non-payment of rent or any other financial obligation due under therental agreement (including any portion thereof) beyond any grace periodunder State law, except that the payment of rent or any other financialobligation due under the rental agreement after the due date, but withinthe grace period permitted under State law, constitutes a minor violation.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 290_MANAGEMENT AND DISPOSITION OF HUD-OWNED MULTIFAMILY HOUSINGPROJECTS </ITAG>14. The authority citation for part 290 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 202, 203, 204, Housing and Community DevelopmentAmendments of 1978 (12 U.S.C. 1715z-1b, 1701z-11, 1701z-12); secs. 207,211, National Housing Act (12 U.S.C. 1713, 1715b); sec. 7(d), Departmentof Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>15. In andSection; 290.17, a new paragraph (h) would be added, to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 290.17 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rental rates during ownership by HUD. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(h) <T3>Signing of consent forms for income verification. </T3>Any certificationsor reexaminations of the income of tenants or prospective tenants in connectionwith tenancy under this section are subject to the requirements for thesigning and submitting of consent forms, as provided by part 200, subpartV, of this chapter. 16. 24 CFR chapter VII would be amended by adding a new part 760, to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 760_INCOME VERIFICATION PROCEDURES FOR APPLICANTS AND PARTICIPANTSIN HUD'S SECTION 8 AND PUBLIC HOUSING PROGRAMS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">760.1 Summary, purpose, and Federal preemption. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">760.3 Applicability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">760.5 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart B_Conditions Governing Collection and Use of Information ObtainedPursuant to Consent Forms </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">760.10 Consent by applicants and participants. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">760.15 Penalties for failing to sign consent forms. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">760.20 Compliance with the Privacy Act and other requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">760.25 Request for wage and claim information from SWICA and restrictionson the use of the information. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">760.30 Procedures for termination, denial, suspension, or reductionof benefits based on information obtained from a SWICA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">760.35 Criminal and civil penalties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Implementation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">760.40 Effective date of rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 904, Stewart B. McKinney Homeless Assistance AmendmentsAct of 1988 (42 U.S.C. 3544), sec. 3, 6, 8, 205, United States HousingAct of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437a, 1437d, 1437f, 1437ee); sec. 202, HousingAct of 1959 (12 U.S.C. 1701q); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and UrbanDevelopment Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 760.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Summary, purpose, and Federal preemption. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Summary. </T3>(1) This part implements section 904 of the Stewart B.McKinney Homeless Assistance Amendments Act of 1988 (``McKinney Amendments'')as it pertains to the section 8 Housing Assistance Payments program andthe Public and Indian Housing programs. Section 904 is implemented forthe assisted mortgage and loan insurance and related programs administeredby HUD under 24 CFR chapter II, subchapter B, at 24 CFR part 200, subpartV. (2) This part requires applicants and participants in the covered programsto sign consent forms authorizing: (i) HUD, the PHA, or the owner to verify employee income information; and(ii) HUD or the PHA to request a SWICA to release wage and claim information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The failure of any person to sign these consent  forms constitutesgrounds for denial of eligibility, or termination of assistance or tenancy(or both), for the covered program. (3) This part restricts the use of information received by HUD or a PHAfrom a SWICA to: (i) Verifying an applicant's or participant's eligibility for or levelof benefits; or(ii) In the case of an owner, informing the owner that an applicant's or participant's eligibility for or level of benefits is uncertain and needsto be verified.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">This part prohibits termination, denial, suspension, or reductionof benefits without prior independent verification of wage and claim informationobtained from a SWICA. The applicant or participant shall then be notifiedof any adverse findings and given an opportunity to contest them. (4) This part provides criminal and civil penalties for certain wrongfulor negligent actions under this part. (b) <T3>Purpose. </T3>The purpose of this part is to enable HUD and PHAs toobtain employee income information and wage and claim information aboutapplicants and participants in the covered programs in order to verifyan applicant's or participant's eligibility for or level of benefits andhelp decrease the incidence of fraud, waste, and abuse in these programs.(c) <T3>Federal Preemption. </T3>This part preempts any State law, includingrestrictions and penalties, which governs the collection and use of employeeincome information and wage and claim information to the extent it is inconsistentwith this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 760.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Information to be Covered by Consent Forms. </T3>The information coveredby consent forms described in this part involves employee income information,and wage and claim information from a SWICA. In addition, consent formsmay authorize the collection of other information, including informationwhich can be obtained under other laws, regulations, and handbooks. (b) <T3>Programs Covered. </T3>This part applies to the following housing assistanceprograms contained in Chapters VIII and IX of this title: (1) Part 880, Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments for New Construction.(2) Part 881, Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments for Substantial Rehabilitation.(3) Part 882, Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments Program for HousingCertificates and Moderate Rehabilitation. (4) Part 883, Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments Program for State HousingAgencies. (5) Part 884, Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments Program, New ConstructionSet-aside for Section 515 Rural Rental Housing Projects. (6) Part 885, Loans for Housing for the Elderly or Handicapped. (7) Part 886, Section 8 Housing Assistance Program Special Allocations(Subpart A, Loan Management, and Subpart C, Property Disposition). (8) Part 887, Housing Vouchers. (9) Part 900, Section 23 Housing Assistance Payments Program_New Constructionand Substantial Rehabilitation. (10) Part 904, Low Income Housing Homeownership Opportunities. (11) Part 905, Indian Housing. (12) Part 960, Admission to, and Occupancy of, Public Housing. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 760.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>As used in this part: <T3>Applicant </T3>has the following meaning for the programs referredto in andSection; 760.3: (a) 24 CFR parts 880, 881, 882, 883, 884, 885, 886, 887 and 900: An applicantfor assistance or participation, as appropriate, under the covered program.(b) 24 CFR part 904: A prospective homebuyer. (c) 24 CFR part 905: A prospective tenant or homebuyer under the program.(d) 24 CFR part 960: A prospective tenant. <T3>Claim information </T3>means information regarding: (a) Whether an individual is receiving, has received, or has applied forunemployment compensation; (b) The amount of compensation the individual is receiving or is entitledto receive; and (c) The period or periods when, or with respect to which, the individualactually received such compensation. <T3>Computer match </T3>means the automated comparison of data bases containingrecords about individuals. <T3>Computer matching agreement </T3>means the agreement which describesthe responsibilities and obligations of the parties regarding a computermatch.<T3>Consent form</T3> means a consent form or forms approved by HUD tobe signed by applicants and participants for the purpose of obtaining employeeincome information from employers and wage and claim information from aSWICA or other information which can be obtained under other laws, regulationsand handbooks. <T3>Employee income information</T3> means all the information known tocurrent or previous employers which HUD or the processing entity determinesis necessary for purposes of determining an applicant's or participant'seligibility for or level of benefits in a covered program. <T3>HUD</T3> means the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.<T3>Owner</T3> means the person or entity (or employee of an owner) thatleases an assisted dwelling unit to an eligible family. <T3>Participant</T3> has the following meaning for the programs referredto in andSection; 760.3. (a) 24 CFR parts 880, 881, 882, 883, 884, 885, 886, 887, and 900: A familyreceiving assistance under the covered program. (b) 24 CFR part 904: A homebuyer under the program. (c) 24 CFR part 905: A tenant or homebuyer under the program. (d) 24 CFR part 960: A tenant under the program. <T3>Public Housing Agency (PHA) </T3>means any State, county, municipality,or other governmental entity or public body (or agency or instrumentalitythereof) that is authorized to engage in or assist in the development oroperation of housing for lower income families under 24 CFR chapters VIIIor IX. The term includes Indian housing authorities. <T3>Processing entity</T3> means the person or entity that is responsiblefor making eligibility determinations and any interim or regularly scheduledincome reexaminations under any of the programs referred to in 24 CFR 750.3.<T3>State Wage Information Collection Agency (SWICA)</T3> means the SWICA,including any Indian tribal agency, receiving quarterly wage reports fromemployers in the State (which may be the agency administering the State'sunemployment compensation program), or an alternative system which hasbeen determined by the Secretary of Labor, to be as effective and timelyin providing employment related income and eligibility information. <T3>Wage information</T3> means information about wages as defined in theState's unemployment compensation law and includes the Social SecurityNumber (or numbers, if more than one) and quarterly wages of an employee,and the name, address, State, and (when known) Federal employer identificationnumber of an employer reporting wages under a State unemployment compensationlaw. <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart B_Conditions Governing Collection and Use of Information ObtainedPursuant to Consent Forms </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 760.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Consent by applicants and participants. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Required consent by applicants and participants.</T3> The followingindividuals shall sign consent forms authorizing HUD, the PHA, or the ownerto verify employee income information, and HUD or the PHA to request aSWICA to release wage and claim information: (1) Each applicant under a program referred to in andSection; 760.3, includingeach family head and spouse regardless of age, and every other member ofthe household of the applicant who is at least 18 years of age; and (2) Each participant in a program referred to in andSection; 760.3, includingeach family head and spouse regardless of age, and every other member ofthe participant's household who is at least 18 years of age. (b) <T3>Consent authorization: to whom and when_</T3>(1) Consent by applicants. Applicants shall sign the consent forms andsubmit them to the processing entity when their eligibility under a programreferred to in andSection; 760.3 is being determined. Applicants shall beresponsible for the signing and submitting of consent forms by membersof their household. (2) Initial consent by participants. If participation for a program referredto in andSection; 760.3 was initiated before the effective date of the part,participants, including members of their family, shall sign and submitconsent forms at the next regularly scheduled income reexamination. Participantsshall be responsible for the signing and submitting of consent forms bymembers of their households. (3) Subsequent consent forms to be signed at each regularly scheduled incomereexamination by participants who have signed initial consent forms underthis section. Once a participant has submitted signed consent forms asan applicant or as a preexisting participant, subsequent consent formsare required to be signed and submitted at each regularly scheduled incomereexamination. (4) Subsequent consent forms to be signed at the next interim or regularlyscheduled income reexamination_special cases. Consent forms are requiredunder the following circumstances: (i) Where there has been a change in the composition of the participant'sfamily, any new member of the family shall sign and submit a consent format the next interim or regularly scheduled income reexamination; (ii) When a member of a family turns 18 years of age, that member shallsign and submit a consent form at the next interim or regularly scheduledreexamination; and (iii) Such other circumstances as HUD (and in the case of the Public Housingprogram, or the Section 8 Certificate, Housing Voucher, or Moderate Rehabilitationprogram, the PHA) may prescribe in administrative instructions. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 760.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Penalties for failing to sign consent forms. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Denial of Eligibility.</T3> The processing entity shall deny the eligibilityof an applicant, in accordance with the provisions governing the programinvolved, if the applicant, or any member of the applicant's household,does not sign and submit the consent forms as required in andSection; 760.10.(b) <T3>Termination of assistance or tenancy. </T3>It shall be considered groundsfor termination of assistance, and (if provided by the individual programcovered by this part) the tenancy of a participant, in accordance withthe provisions governing the program involved, if the participant, or anymember of the participant's household, fails to sign and submit the consentforms as required in andSection; 760.10. (c) <T3>Cross references. </T3>Individuals should consult the regulations andadministrative instructions for the programs referred to in andSection; 760.3for further information on the use of employee income information and wageand claim information in determining the eligibility of applicants andthe continued eligibility of participants. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 760.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Compliance with the Privacy Act and other requirements. </ITAG><T3>Compliance with the Privacy Act. </T3>The collection, maintenance,use, and dissemination of employee income information and wage and claiminformation under this part shall be conducted, to the extent applicable,in compliance with the Privacy Act (5 U.S.C. 552a) and all other provisionsof Federal, State, and local law. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 760.25 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Request for wage and claim information from SWICA and restrictionson the use of the information. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Information Available from SWICA_to whom and what. </T3>HUD or thePHA may, after signed consent forms have been submitted to the processingentity by an applicant or participant, request wage and claim informationfrom a SWICA. Regulations prescribed by the Secretary of Labor govern howoften and in what form information may be disclosed by a SWICA. Wage andclaim information will generally be obtained through computer matchingagreements between HUD or a PHA and a SWICA, as described in paragraph(c) of this section. (b) <T3>Restrictions on Use of Wage and Claim Information Obtained from SWICA.</T3>HUD or a PHA may only use wage and claim information obtained froma SWICA: (1) To verify an applicant's or participant's eligibility for or levelof benefits; or  (2) In the case of an owner, to inform the owner that an applicant's orparticipant's eligibility for or level of benefits is uncertain and needsto be verified. (c) <T3>Computer Matching Agreements between PHAs and SWICA. </T3>Before enteringinto a computer matching agreement with a SWICA for wage and claim information,the PHA shall submit the agreement to HUD for review and approval. Computermatching agreements shall specify, among other things, the purpose andthe legal authority for the match, a description of the records to be matched,a statement regarding disposition of information generated through thematch, a description of the administrative and technical safeguards tobe used in protecting the information obtained through the match, a descriptionof the use of records, duplication and redisclosure restrictions, and theamount a SWICA will charge HUD or a PHA for processing a request. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 760.30 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures for termination, denial, suspension, or reduction of benefitsbased on information obtained from a SWICA. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Termination, Denial, Suspension, or Reduction of Benefits. </T3>A Federal,State, or local agency, a PHA or an owner may terminate, deny, suspend,or reduce any benefits of an applicant or participant based on wage andclaim information obtained from a SWICA if: (1) The agency or owner has taken the steps contained in paragraph (b)to independently verify wage and claim information relating to_ (i) The amount of the wages or unemployment compensation involved; (ii) whether such applicant or participant actually has (or had) accessto such wages or benefits for his or her own use; and (iii) the period or periods when, or with respect to which, the applicantor participant actually received the wages or benefits; and (2) the applicant or participant has been given an opportunity to contestany adverse findings in accordance with paragraph (c) of this section.(b) <T3>Procedures for Independent Verification. </T3>(1) <T3>Where HUD or a PHA is responsible for determining eligibility for orlevel of benefits. </T3>The following procedure constitutes independentverification for purposes of paragraph (a) of this section where a PHAis responsible for determining an applicant's or participant's eligibilityfor or level of benefits in a covered program. (i) Where HUD receives wage and claim information from a SWICA, HUD shallcompare the information with applicant and participant information abouta family's income provided by the PHA to HUD. Where the wage and claiminformation reveals an employer that was not disclosed by the applicantor participant or where the wage and claim information differs from theinformation received from the applicant or participant or from his or heremployer, HUD shall have the PHA request the undisclosed employer or otheremployer to furnish in writing to the PHA any information necessary toestablish an applicant's or participant's eligibility for or level of benefitsin a covered program. Neither HUD nor the PHA may disclose wage and claiminformation to an owner.(ii) Where a PHA receives wage and claim information from a SWICA, thePHA shall compare the information with applicant and participant informationabout a family's income provided by the applicant or participant or fromhis or her employer. Where the wage and claim information reveals an employerthat was not disclosed by the applicant or participant or where the wageand claim information differs from the information received from the applicantor participant or from his or her employer, the PHA shall request the undisclosedemployer or other employer to furnish in writing to the PHA any informationnecessary to establish an applicant's or participant's eligibility foror level of benefits in a covered program. Neither HUD nor the PHA maydisclose wage and claim information to an owner. (2) <T3>Where an owner is responsible for determining eligibility for or levelof benefits. </T3>The following procedure constitutes independent verificationfor purposes of paragraph (a) of this section if an owner is responsiblefor determining an applicant's or participant's eligibility for or levelof benefits in a covered program. Upon receiving wage and claim informationfrom a SWICA, HUD or the PHA, as applicable, shall compare the wage andclaim information with the information about a family's income obtainedby the owner from the applicant or participant or from his or her employer.Where the wage and claim information reveals an employer that was not disclosedby the applicant or participant or where the wage and claim informationdiffers from the information received from the applicant or participantor from his or her employer, HUD or the PHA shall request the undisclosedemployer or other employer to furnish in writing to the owner any informationHUD or the PHA determines to be necessary for purposes of having the ownerredetermine an applicant's or participant's eligibility for or level ofbenefits in a covered program. Based on the wage and claim information,HUD or the PHA may inform an owner that an applicant's or participant'seligibility for or level of benefits is uncertain and needs to be verified.The owner shall then reverify the applicant's or participant income informationby checking the accuracy of the information with the employer or directlywith the family. However, before any benefits are terminated, denied, suspended,or reduced, HUD or the PHA shall independently verify the wage and claimdata obtained from a SWICA as descibed in this paragraph. Neither HUD northe PHA may disclose wage and claim information to an owner. (3) <T3>Verification by Applicant or Participant. </T3>Where independent verificationcannot be obtained from any other source, HUD or a PHA may independentlyverify wage and claim informatiom obtained from a SWICA by checking theaccuracy of the information with the applicant or participant directly.(c) <T3>Opportunity to Contest. </T3>HUD, the PHA, or the owner shall promptlynotify any applicant or participant in writing of any adverse findingsmade on the basis of the information verified in accordance with paragraph(b) of this section. Termination, denial, suspension, or reduction of benefitsshall be determined according to the standards, including income standards,applicable to each individual program. The applicant or participant shallbe given an opportunity to contest the findings in the same manner as appliesto other information and findings relating to eligibility factors underthe applicable housing assistance program. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 760.35 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criminal and civil penalties. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Criminal Penalties. </T3>Any person who knowingly and willfully requestsor obtains under false pretenses any wage and claim information concerningan applicant or participant from a SWICA pursuant to this part, or whoknowingly and willfully discloses any such information in any manner toany individual not entitled under any law to receive it, shall be guiltyof a misdemeanor and fined not more than $5,000. The term ``person'' forpurposes of this paragraph shall include an officer or employee of HUD,an officer or employee of any PHA, and any owner (or employee of an owner)responsible for determining eligibility for or level of benefits. (b) <T3>Civil Penalties. </T3>Any applicant or participant affected by: (1) A negligent or knowing disclosure of information referred to in section904 of the McKinney Amendments or section 303(i) of the Social SecurityAct, about such person by an officer or employee of any PHA or owner (oremployee of an owner), which disclosure is not authorized by section 904,section 303(i), or any implementing regulation, or (2) Any other negligent or knowing action that is inconsistent with section904, section 303(i), or any implementing regulation may bring a civil actionfor damages and such other relief as may be appropriate against any officeror employee of any PHA or owner (or employee of an owner) responsible forany such unauthorized action. Authorized use of employee income informationincludes any use of the information determined by HUD, a PHA, or an ownerto be necessary for determining eligibility for or level of benefits ina covered program and not prohibited by any Federal or State law. Jurisdictionof such a case is in the United States district court in the district inwhich the affected applicant or participant resides, in which the unauthorizedaction occurred, or in which the applicant or participant alleged to beresponsible for the unauthorized action resides. Appropriate relief thatmay be ordered by the district court shall include reasonable attorneyfees and other litigation costs.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Implementation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 760.40 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Effective date of rule. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Applicants. </T3>The provisions of this part, and the conforming changesmade with respect to consent forms in the regulations governing the programsreferred to in andSection; 760.3, apply to all applicant eligibility determinationsinitiated on or after the effective date of this rule. (b) <T3>Participants. </T3>The provisions of this part, and the conformingchanges made with respect to the execution of income verification consentforms for participants in the regulations governing the programs referredto in andSection; 760.3, apply to: (1) Each interim or regularly scheduled reexamination of the income ofa participant initiated by the processing entity on or after the effectivedate of the rule; and (2) Each such reexamination thereafter. <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 813_DEFINITION OF INCOME, INCOME LIMITS, RENT AND REEXAMINATIONOF FAMILY INCOME FOR THE SECTION 8 HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PROGRAMAND RELATED PROGRAMS </ITAG>17. This authority citation for part 813 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 3, 5(b), 8, 16, United States Housing Act of1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437a, 1437c, 1437f, 1437n); Sec. 7(d) Department of Housingand Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>18. In andSection; 813.109, paragraph (a) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 813.109 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Initial determination, verification, and reexamination of family incomeand composition. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Responsibility for initial determination and reexamination. </T3>Theowner or PHA shall be responsible for determination of eligibility foradmission; for determination of Annual Income, Adjusted Income and TotalTenant Payment; and for reexamination of Family income and compositionat least annually, as provided in pertinent program regulations and handbooks(see, <T3>e.g., </T3>part 880, subpart F and part 881, subpart F which for purposesof this part shall apply (as appropriate) to projects developed under 24CFR part 885, subpart B; 24 CFR part 882, subparts B and E; 24 CFR part883, subpart G; 24 CFR part 884, subpart B; 24 CFR part 885, subpart C;24 CFR part 886, subpart A and C; 24 CFR part 887, subpart H; 24 CFR part750 for the disclosure and verification of Social Security Numbers; and24 CFR part 760 for the signing and submission of consent forms). As usedin this Part, the ``effective date'' of an examination or reexaminationrefers to (1) In the case of an examination for admission, the effective date ofinitial occupancy; and (2) In the case of a reexamination of an existing tenant, the effectivedate of the redetermined housing assistance payment with respect to theHousing Voucher program (24 CFR part 887) and the effective date of theredetermined Total Tenant Payment. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 880_SECTION 8 HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PROGRAM FOR NEW CONSTRUCTION</ITAG>19. The authority citation for 24 CFR Part 880 would continue to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 3, 5, 8, United States Housing Act of 1937 (42U.S.C. 1437a, 1437c, 1437f); Sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and UrbanDevelopment Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>20. In andSection; 880.601, paragraph (b) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 880.601 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsibilities of owner. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) <T3>Management and maintenance. </T3>The owner is responsible for all managementfunctions (including provision of Federal selection preferences in accordancewith andSection; 880.613, selection of tenants, obtaining and verifying SocialSecurity Numbers submitted by families (as provided by 24 CFR part 750),obtaining signed consent forms from families (as provided by 24 CFR part760), reexamination of family income, evictions and other terminationsof tenancy, and collection of rents and all repair and maintenance functions(including ordinary and extraordinary maintenance and replacement of capitalitems). All these functions must be performed in compliance with applicableEqual Opportunity requirements. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>21. In andSection; 880.603, the introductory text of paragraph (b), and paragraphs(b)(3) and (c), would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 880.603 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selection and admission of assisted tenants. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) <T3>Determination of eligibility and selection of tenants. </T3>The owneris responsible for determining whether the applicant is eligible, in accordancewith parts 812 and 813 of this chapter, and parts 750 and 760 of chapterVII. The owner is also responsible for the selection of families, includinggiving a Federal selection preference in accordance with andSection; 880.613.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(3) If the owner determines that an applicant is ineligible on the basisof income or family composition, or because of failure to meet the disclosureand verification requirements for Social Security Numbers (as providedby 24 CFR part 750), or because of failure by an applicant to sign andsubmit consent forms (as provided by 24 CFR part 760), or that the owneris not selecting the applicant for other reasons, the owner will promptlynotify the applicant in writing of the determination and its reasons, andthat the applicant has the right to meet with the owner or managing agentin accordance with HUD requirements. Where the owner is a PHA, the applicantmay request an informal hearing. If the PHA determines that the applicantis not eligible, the PHA will notify the applicant and inform the applicantthat he or she has the right to request HUD review of the PHA's determination.The applicant may also exercise other rights if the applicant believesthat he or she is being discriminated against on the basis of race, color,creed, religion, sex, or national origin. The informal review provisionsfor the denial of a Federal preference under andSection; 880.613 are containedin paragraph (k) of that section. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) <T3>Reexamination of family income and composition. </T3>(1) <T3>Regular reexaminations. </T3>The owner must reexamine the income andcomposition of all families at least every 12 months. Upon verificationof the information, the owner must make appropriate adjustments in theTotal Tenant Payment in accordance with part 813 of this chapter and determinewhether the family's unit size is still appropriate. The owner must adjustTenant Rent and the Housing Assistance Payment to reflect any change inTotal Tenant Payment and must carry out any unit transfer required by HUD.At the time of the annual reexamination of family income and composition,the owner must require the family to disclose and verify Social SecurityNumbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, and to sign and submit consentforms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. (2) <T3>Interim reexaminations. </T3>The family must comply with provisionsin its lease regarding interim reporting of changes in income. If the ownerreceives information concerning a change in the Family's income or othercircumstances between regularly scheduled reexaminations, the Owner mustconsult with the family and make any adjustments determined to be appropriate.At the time of the interim reexamination, the owner must require the familyto sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. Any changein the family's income or other circunstances that results in an adjustmentin the Total Tenant Payment, Tenant Rent and Housing Assistance Paymentmust be verified. See 24 CFR 750.10(d)(2)(i) for the requirements for thedisclosure and verification of Social Security Numbers at interim reexaminationsinvolving new family members. (3) <T3>Continuation of housing assistance payments. </T3>A family's eligibilityfor Housing Assistance Payments continues until the Total Tenant Paymentequals the Gross Rent. The termination of eligibility at such point willnot affect the family's other rights under its lease, nor will such terminationpreclude the resumption of payments as a result of later changes in income,rents, or other relevant circumstances during the term of the Contract.However, eligibility also may be terminated in accordance with HUD requirements,for such reasons as failure to submit requested verification information,including failure to meet the disclosure and verification requirementsfor Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, or failureto sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. 26. In andSection; 880.607, paragraph (b)(3) would be revised to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 880.607 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination of tenancy and modification of lease. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (3) <T3>Material noncompliance. </T3>Material noncompliance with the leaseincludes: (i) One or more substantial violations of the lease; or (ii) Repeated minor violations of the lease that disrupt the livabilityof the building; adversely affect the health or safety of any person orthe right of any tenant to the quiet enjoyment of the leased premises andrelated facilities; interfere with the management of the building or havean adverse financial effect on the building.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Failure of the family to timely submit all required information onfamily income and composition or eligibility factors (including failureto disclose and verify Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part750, failure to sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part760, or knowingly providing incomplete or inaccurate information) willconstitute a substantial violation of the lease. Nonpayment of rent orany other financial obligation due under the lease (including any portionthereof) beyond any grace period permitted under State law will constitutea substantial violation of the lease. The payment of rent or any otherfinancial obligation due under the lease after the due date but withinthe grace period permitted under State law will constitute a minor violation.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 881_SECTION 8 HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PROGRAM FOR SUBSTANTIALREHABILITATION </ITAG>23. The authority citation for part 881 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 3, 5, 8, United States Housing Act of 1937 (42U.S.C. 1437a, 1437c, 1437f); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and UrbanDevelopment Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>24. In andSection; 881.601, paragraph (b) would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 881.601 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsibilities of owner. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) <T3>Management and maintenance. </T3>The owner is responsible for all managementfunctions (including provision of Federal selection preferences in accordancewith andSection; 881.613, selection of tenants, obtaining and verifying SocialSecurity Numbers submitted by families (as provided by 24 CFR part 750),obtaining signed consent forms from families (as provided by 24 CFR part760), reexamination of family incomes, evictions and other terminationsof tenancy, and collection of rents and all repair and maintenance functions(including ordinary and extraordinary maintenance and replacement of capitalitems). All these functions must be performed in compliance with applicableEqual Opportunity requirements. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>25. In andSection; 881.603, the introductory text of paragraph (b), and paragraphs(b)(3) and (c), would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 881.603 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selection and admission of assisted tenants. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) <T3>Determination of eligibility and selection of tenants. </T3>The owneris responsible for determining whether the applicant is eligible, in accordancewith parts 812 and 813 of this chapter, and parts 750 and 760 of chapterVII. The owner is also responsible for the selection of families, includinggiving a Federal selection preference in accordance with andSection; 881.613.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(3) If the owner determines that an applicant is ineligible on the basisof income or family composition, or because of failure to meet the disclosureand verification requirements for Social Security Numbers (as providedby 24 CFR part 750), or because the applicant fails to sign and submitconsent forms (as provided by 24 CFR part 760), or that the owner is notselecting the applicant for other reasons, the owner will promptly notifythe applicant in writing of the determination and its reasons, and thatthe applicant has the right to meet with the owner or managing agent inaccordance with HUD requirements. Where the owner is a PHA, the applicantmay request an informal hearing. If the PHA determines that the applicantis not eligible, the PHA will notify the applicant and inform the applicantthat he or she has the right to request HUD review of the PHA's determination.The applicant may also exercise other rights if the applicant believesthat he or she is being discriminated against on the basis of race, color,creed, religion, sex, or national origin. The informal review provisionsfor the denial of a Federal preference under andSection; 881.613 are containedin paragraph (k) of that section. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) <T3>Reexamination of family income and composition. </T3>(1) <T3>Regular reexaminations. </T3>The owner must reexamine the income andcomposition of all families at least once every 12 months. After consultationwith the family and upon verification of the information, the owner mustmake appropriate adjustments in the Total Tenant Payment in accordancewith part 813 of this chapter and determine whether the family's unit sizeis still appropriate. The owner must adjust Tenant Rent and the HousingAssistance Payment to reflect any change in Total Tenant Payment and mustcarry out any unit transfer required by HUD. At the time of the annualreexamination of family income and composition, the owner must requirethe family to disclose and verify Social Security Numbers, as providedby 24 CFR part 750, and to sign and submit consent forms, as provided by24 CFR part 760. (2) <T3>Interim reexaminations. </T3>The family must comply with provisionsin its lease regarding interim reporting of changes in income. If the Ownerreceives information concerning a change in income between regularly scheduledreexaminations, the Owner must consult with the family and make any adjustmentsdetermined to be appropriate. At the time of the interim reexamination,the Owner must require the family to sign and submit consent forms, asprovided by 24 CFR part 760. Any change in the family's income or othercircumstances that results in an adjustment in the Total Tenant Payment,Tenant Rent and Housing Assistance Payment must be verified. See 24 CFR750.10(d)(2)(i) for the requirements for the disclosure and verificationof Social Security Numbers at interim reexaminations involving new familymembers. (3) <T3>Continuation of housing assistance payments. </T3>A family's eligibilityfor Housing Assistance Payments continues until the Total Tenant Paymentequals the Gross Rent. The termination of eligibility at such point willnot affect the family's other rights under its lease, nor will such terminationpreclude the resumption of payments as a result of later changes in income,rents, or other relevant circumstances during the term of the contract.However, eligibility also may be terminated in accordance with HUD requirements,for such reasons as failure to submit requested verification information,including failure to meet the disclosure and verification requirementsfor Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, or failureto sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. 22. In andSection; 880.607, paragraph (b)(3) would be revised to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 880.607 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination of tenancy and modification of lease. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (3) <T3>Material noncompliance. </T3>Material noncompliance with the leaseincludes: (i) One or more substantial violations of the lease; or (ii) Repeated minor violations of the lease that disrupt the livabilityof the building; adversely affect the health or safety of any person orthe right of any tenant to the quiet enjoyment of the leased premises andrelated facilities; interfere with the management of the building; or havean adverse financial effect on the building. Failure of the family to timelysubmit all required information on family income and composition or eliqibilityfactors (including failure to disclose and verify Social Security Numbers(as provided by 24 CFR part 750), failure to sign and submit consent forms(as provided by 24 CFR part 760), or knowingly provide incomplete or inaccurateinformation) will constitute a substantial violation of the lease. Nonpaymentof rent or any other financial obligation due under the lease (includingany portion thereof) beyond any grace period permitted under State lawwill constitute a substantial violation of the lease. The payment of rentor any other financial obligation due under the lease after the due datebut within the grace period permitted under State law will constitute aminor violation. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 882_SECTION 8 HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PROGRAM_EXISTING HOUSING</ITAG>27. The authority citation for part 882 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 3, 5, 8, United States Housing Act of 1937 (42U.S.C. 1437a, 1437c, 1437f); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and UrbanDevelopment Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>28. In andSection; 882.116, paragraphs (c) and (m) would be revised to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 882.116 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsibilities of the PHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) Receipt and review of applications for Certificates of Family Participation;provision of a Federal preference in selecting applicants for participationin accordance with andSection; 882.219; verification of family income andother factors relating to eligibility and amount of assistance (includingobtaining and verifying Social Security Numbers submitted by families,as provided by 24 CFR part 750, and requiring families to sign and submitconsent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760); and maintenance of a waitinglist in accordance with this part; <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(m) Reexamination of family income, composition, and extent of medicalor child care expenses; redeterminations, as appropriate, of the amountof Total Tenant Payment and amount of housing assistance payment in accordancewith part 813 of this chapter; obtaining and verifying Social SecurityNumbers submitted by families, as provided by 24 CFR part 750; and requiringfamilies to sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>29. In andSection; 882.118, paragraph (a)(1) would be revised to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 882.118</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Obligations of the Family. </ITAG>(a) The family must: (1) Supply such certification, release, information, or documentation asthe PHA or HUD determine to be necessary, including the submission of SocialSecurity Numbers and verifying documentation (as provided by 24 CFR part750), the submission of signed consent forms (as provided by 24 CFR part760), and submissions required for an annual or interim reexamination offamily income and composition. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>30. In andSection; 882.209, paragraph (a)(2) would be revised to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 882.209</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Selection and participation. </ITAG>(a) * * * (2) The PHA must determine whether an applicant for participation:  (i) Qualifies as a family; (ii) Has disclosed and verified Social Security Numbers, as provided by24 CFR part 750; (iii) Has signed and submitted consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part760; and (iv) Is income-eligible. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>31. In andSection; 882.210, new paragraph (e) would be added: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 882.210 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Grounds for denial or termination of assistance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(e) The PHA shall deny the eligibility of an applicant, if the applicant,or any member of the applicant's household does not sign and submit consentforms as provided by 24 CFR 760. It shall be considered grounds for terminationof assistance, if the participant, or any member of the participant's householdfails to sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR 760. 32. In andSection; 882.212, paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) would be revisedto read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 882.212 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reexamination of family income and composition. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Regular reexaminations. </T3>The PHA must reexamine the income andcomposition of all families at least once every 12 months. After consultationwith the family and upon verification of the information, the PHA mustmake appropriate adjustments in the Total Tenant Payment in accordancewith part 813 of this chapter and determine whether the family's unit sizeis still appropriate (see andSection; 882.213). The PHA must adjust TenantRent and the Housing Assistance Payment to reflect any change in TotalTenant Payment. At the time of the annual reexamination of family incomeand composition, the PHA must require the family to disclose and verifySocial Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, and to sign andsubmit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. (b) <T3>Interim reexaminations. </T3>The family must comply with provisionsin andSection; 882.118 regarding interim reporting of changes in income.If the PHA receives information concerning a change in the family's incomeor other circumstances between regularly scheduled reexaminations, thePHA must consult with the family and make any adjustments determined tobe appropriate. At the time of the interim reexamination, the PHA mustrequire the family to sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24CFR part 760. Any change in the family's income or other circumstancesthat results in an adjustment in the Total Tenant Payment, Tenant Rent,and Housing Assistance Payment must be verified. See 24 CFR 750.10(d)(2)(i)for the requirements for the disclosure and verification of Social SecurityNumbers at interim reexaminations involving new family members. (c) <T3>Continuation of housing assistance payments. </T3>A family's eligibilityfor Housing Assistance Payments shall continue until the Total Tenant Paymentequals the Gross Rent. The termination of eligibility at such point willnot affect the family's other rights under its lease, nor will such terminationpreclude the resumption of payments as a result of later changes in income,rents or other relevant circumstances during the term of the Contract.However, eligibility also may be terminated in accordance with HUD requirementsfor such reasons as failure to submit requested verification information,including failure to meet the disclosure and verification requirementsfor Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, or failureto sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>33. In andSection; 882.514, paragraph (a)(1) would be revised to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 882.514 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Family participation. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Initial determination of family eligibility. </T3>(1) The PHA is responsiblefor receipt and review of applications, and determination of family eligibilityfor participation in accordance with HUD regulations (see 24 CFR parts812 and 813, and 24 CFR parts 750 and 760). The PHA is responsible forverifying the sources and amount of the family's income and other informationnecessary for determining income eligibility and the amount of the assistancepayments. The PHA is also responsible for giving a Federal selection preferencein accordance with andSection; 822.517. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>34. Section 882.515 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 882.515 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reexamination of family income and composition. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Regular reexaminations. </T3>The PHA must reexamine the income andcomposition of all families at least once every 12 months. After consultationwith the family and upon verification of the information, the PHA mustmake appropriate adjustments in the Total Tenant Payment in accordancewith Part 813 of this chapter and determine whether the family's unit sizeis still appropriate (see andSection; 882.213). The PHA must adjust TenantRent and the Housing Assistance Payment to reflect any change in TotalTenant Payment. At the time of the annual reexamination of family incomeand composition, the PHA must require the family to disclose and verifySocial Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, and to sign andsubmit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. (b) <T3>Interim reexaminations. </T3>The family must comply with provisionsin andSection; 882.118 regarding interim reporting of changes in income.If the PHA receives information concerning a change in the family's incomeor other circumstances between regularly scheduled reexaminations, thePHA must consult with the family and make any adjustments determined tobe appropriate. At the time of the interim reexamination, the PHA mustrequire the family to sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24CFR part 760. Any change in the family's income or other circumstancesthat results in an adjustment in the Total Tenant Payment, Tenant Rent,and Housing Assistance Payment must be verified. See 24 CFR 750.10(d)(2)(i)for the requirements for the disclosure and verification of Social SecurityNumbers at interim reexaminations involving new family members. (c) <T3>Continuation of housing assistance payments. </T3>A family's eligibilityfor Housing Assistance Payments shall continue until the Total Tenant Paymentequals the Gross Rent. The termination of eligibility at such point willnot affect the family's other rights under its lease, nor will such terminationpreclude the resumption of payments as a result of later changes in income,rents or other relevant circumstances during the term of the Contract.However, eligibility also may be terminated in accordance with HUD requirementsfor such reasons as failure to submit requested verification information,including failure to meet the disclosure and verification requirementsfor Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, or failureto sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 883_SECTION 8 HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PROGRAM_STATE HOUSINGAGENCIES </ITAG>35. The authority citation for Part 883 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 3, 5, 8, United States Housing Act of 1937 (42U.S.C. 1437a, 1437c, and 1437f); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and UrbanDevelopment Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>36. In andSection; 883.702, paragraph (b) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 883.702 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsibilities of owner. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) <T3>Management and maintenance. </T3>The owner is responsible for all managementfunctions (including provision of Federal selection preferences in accordancewith andSection; 883.714, selection of tenants, obtaining and verifying SocialSecurity Numbers submitted by families (as provided by 24 CFR part 750),obtaining signed consent forms (as provided by 24 CFR part 760), reexaminationof family income, evictions and other terminations of tenancy, and collectionof rents) and all repair and maintenance functions (including ordinaryand extraordinary maintenance and replacement of capital items). All thesefunctions must be performed in compliance with applicable Equal Opportunityrequirements. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>37. In andSection; 883.704, the introductory text of paragraph (b), and paragraphs(b)(3) and (c), would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 883.704</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Selection and admission of tenants. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) <T3>Determination of eligibility and selection of tenants.</T3> The owneris responsible for determining whether the applicant is eligible, in accordancewith parts 812 and 813 of this chapter, and parts 750 and 760 of chapterVII. The owner is also responsible for the selection of families, includinggiving a Federal preference in accordance with andSection; 883.714. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(3) If the owner determines that an applicant is ineligible on the basisof income or family composition, or because of failure to meet the disclosureand verification requirements for Social Security Numbers (as providedby 24 CFR part 750), or because of failure to sign and submit consent forms(as provided by 24 CFR part 760), or that the owner is not selecting theapplicant for other reasons, the owner will promptly notify the applicantin writing of the determination and its reasons, and that the applicanthas the right to meet with the owner or managing agent in accordance withHUD requirements. Where the owner is a PHA, the applicant may request aninformal hearing. If the PHA determines that the applicant is not eligible,the PHA will notify the applicant and inform the applicant that he or shehas the right to request a review by the Agency and HUD of the PHA's determination.The applicant may also exercise other rights if the applicant believesthat he or she is being discriminated against on the basis of race, color,creed, religion, sex, or national origin. The informal review provisionsfor the denial of a Federal preference are contained in andSection; 883.714(k).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) <T3>Reexamination of family income and composition.</T3> (1) <T3>Regular reexaminations.</T3> The owner must reexamine the income andcomposition of all families at least once every 12 months. After consultationwith the family and upon verification of the information, the owner mustmake appropriate adjustments in the Total Tenant Payment in accordancewith part 813 of this chapter and determine whether the family's unit sizeis still appropriate. The owner must adjust Tenant Rent and the HousingAssistance Payment to reflect any change in Total Tenant Payment and mustcarry out any unit transfer required by HUD. At the time of the annualreexamination of family income and composition, the owner must requirethe family to disclose and verify Social Security Numbers, as providedby 24 CFR part 750, and to sign and submit consent forms, as provided by24 CFR part 760. (2) <T3>Interim reexaminations.</T3> The family must comply with provisionsin its lease regarding interim reporting of changes in income. If the Ownerreceives information concerning a change in the family's income or othercircumstances between regularly scheduled reexaminations, the Owner mustconsult with the family and make any adjustments determined to be appropriate.At the time of the interim reexamination, the Owner must require the familyto sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. Any changein the family's income or other circumstances that results in an adjustmentin the Total Tenant Payment, Tenant Rent, and Housing Assistance Paymentmust be verified. See 24 CFR 750.10(d)(2)(i) for the requirements for thedisclosure and verification of Social Security Numbers at interim reexaminationsinvolving new family members. (3) <T3>Continuation of housing assistance payments.</T3> A family's eligibilityfor Housing Assistance Payments continues until the Total Tenant Paymentequals the Gross Rent. The termination of eligibility at such point willnot affect the family's other rights under its lease, nor will such terminationpreclude the resumption of payments as a result of later changes in income,rents or other relevant circumstances during the term of the contract.However, eligibility also may be terminated in accordance with HUD requirements,for such reasons as failure to submit requested verification information,including failure to meet the disclosure and verification requirementsfor Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, or failureto sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. 38. In andSection; 883.708, paragraph (b)(3) would be revised to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 883.708</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Termination of tenancy and modification of lease. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (3) <T3>Material noncompliance.</T3> Material noncompliance with the leaseincludes:(i) One or more substantial violations of the lease; or(ii) Repeated minor violations of the lease that disrupt the livabilityof the building, adversely affect the health or safety of any person orthe right of any tenant to the quiet enjoyment of the leased premises andrelated facilities; interfere with the management of the building; or havean adverse financial effect on the building or project. Failure of thefamily to timely submit all required information on family income and compositionor eligibility factors (including failure to disclose and verify SocialSecurity Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, failure to sign and submitconsent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760, or knowingly provide incompleteor inaccurate information) will constitute a substantial violation of thelease. Nonpayment of rent or any other financial obligation due under thelease (including any portion thereof) beyond any grace period permittedunder State law will constitute a substantial violation of the lease. Thepayment of rent or any other financial obligation due under the lease afterthe due date but within the grace period permitted under State law willconstitute a minor violation. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 884_SECTION 8 HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PROGRAM, NEW CONSTRUCTIONSET-ASIDE FOR SECTION 515 RURAL RENTAL HOUSING PROJECTS </ITAG>39. The authority citation for part 884 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 3, 5, 8, United States Housing Act of 1937 (42U.S.C. 1437a, 1437c, and 1437f); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and UrbanDevelopment Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>40. In andSection; 884.118, paragraphs (a)(3) and (a)(7) would be revisedto read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 884.118 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsibilities of the owner. </ITAG>(a) * * * (3) Performance of all management functions, including the taking of applications;selection of families, including verification of income, provision of Federalselection preferences in accordance with andSection; 884.226, obtaining andverifying Social Security Numbers submitted by applicants (as providedby 24 CFR part 750), obtaining signed consent forms from applicants (asprovided by 24 CFR part 760), and other pertinent requirements; and determinationof eligibility and amount of tenant rent in accordance with HUD-establishedschedules and criteria. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(7) Reexamination of family income and composition; redetermination, asappropriate, of the amount of Tenant Rent and the amount of housing assistancepayment in accordance with part 813; obtaining and verifying Social SecurityNumbers submitted by participants, as provided by 24 CFR part 750; andobtaining signed consent forms from participants, as provided by 24 CFRpart 760. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>41. Section 884.216 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 884.216 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination of tenancy. </ITAG>The Owner shall be responsible for termination of tenancies, includingevictions. However, conditions for payment of housing assistance paymentsfor any resulting vacancies must be as set forth in andSection; 884.106(c)(1).Failure of the family to sign and submit consent forms, as provided by24 CFR part 760, shall be grounds for termination of tenancy. 42. Section 884.218 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 884.218 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reexamination of family income and composition. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Regular reexaminations. </T3>The owner must reexamine the income andcomposition of all families at least once each year. Upon verificationof the information, the owner must make appropriate adjustments in theTotal Tenant Payment in accordance with part 813 of this chapter and determinewhether the family's unit size is still appropriate. The owner must adjustTenant Rent and the Housing Assistance Payment to reflect any change inTotal Tenant Payment and carry out any unit transfer required by HUD. Atthe time of the annual reexamination of family income and composition,the owner must require the family to disclose and verify Social SecurityNumbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, and to sign and submit consentforms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. (b) <T3>Interim reexaminations. </T3>The family must comply with provisionsof its lease regarding interim reporting of changes in income. If the ownerreceives information concerning a change in the family's income or othercircumstances between regularly scheduled reexaminations, the owner mustconsult with the family and make any adjustments determined to be appropriate.At the time of the interim reexamination, the owner must require the familyto sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. Any changein the family's income or other circumstances that results in an adjustmentin the Total Tenant Payment, Tenant Rent and Housing Assistance Paymentmust be verified. See 24 CFR 750.10(d)(2)(i) for the requirements for thedisclosure and verification of Social Security Numbers at interim reexaminationsinvolving new family members. (c) <T3>Continuation of housing assistance payments. </T3>A family's eligibilityfor Housing Assistance Payments continues until the Total Tenant Paymentequals the Gross Rent, or until the family loses eligibility for continuedoccupancy under Farmer's Home Administration regulations. However, eligibilityalso may be terminated in accordance with HUD requirements, for such reasonsas failure to submit requested verification information, including failureto meet the disclosure and verification requirements for Social SecurityNumbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, or failure to sign and submitconsent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 885_LOANS FOR HOUSING FOR THE ELDERLY OR HANDICAPPED </ITAG>43. The authority citation for part 885 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 202, Housing Act of 1959 (12 U.S.C. 1701q); sec.8, United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437f); sec. 7(d), Departmentof Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>44. In andSection; 885.950, paragraphs (a) and (c) would be revised to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.950 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selection and admission of tenants. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Application for admission. </T3>The Borrower must accept applicationsfor admission to the project in the form prescribed by HUD. Applicant familiesapplying for assisted units (or residential spaces in a group home) mustcomplete a certification of eligibility as part of the application foradmission. Applicant families must meet the disclosure and verificationrequirements for Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750.Applicant families must sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24CFR part 760. Both the Borrower and the applicant family must completeand sign the application for admission. On request, the Borrower must furnishcopies of all applications for admission to HUD. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) <T3>Reexamination of family income and composition_</T3>(1) <T3>Regular reexaminations. </T3>If the family occupies an assisted unit(or residential space in a group home), the Borrower must reexamine theincome and composition of the family at least every 12 months. Upon verificationof the information, the Borrower shall make appropriate adjustments inthe Total Tenant Payment in accordance with 24 CFR part 813, as modifiedby andSection; 885.5 and determine whether the family's unit size is stillappropriate. The Borrower must adjust Tenant Rent and the Project AssistancePayment and must carry out any unit transfer in accordance with HUD standards.At the time of the annual reexamination of family income and composition,the Borrower must require the family to disclose and verify Social SecurityNumbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, and to sign and submit consentforms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. (2) <T3>Interim reexaminations. </T3>If the family occupies an assisted unit(or residential space in a group home) the family must comply with provisionsin the lease regarding interim reporting of changes in income. If the Borrowerreceives information concerning a change in the family's income or othercircumstances between regularly scheduled reexaminations, the Borrowermust consult with the family and make any adjustments determined to beappropriate. At the time of the interim reexamination, the Borrower mustrequire the family to sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24CFR part 760. Any change in the family's income or other circumstancesthat results in an adjustment in the Total Tenant Payment, Tenant Rentand Project Assistance Payment must be verified. See 24 CFR 750.10(d)(2)(i)for the requirements for the disclosure and verification of Social SecurityNumbers at interim reexaminations involving new family members. (3) <T3>Continuation of project assistance payment. </T3>(i) A family occupyingan assisted unit (or residential space in a group home) shall remain eligiblefor Project Assistance Payment until the Total Tenant Payment equals orexceeds the Gross Rent (or a pro rata share of the Gross Rent in a grouphome). The termination of subsidy eligibility will not affect the family'sother rights under its lease. Project Assistance Payment may be resumedif, as a result of changes in income, rent or other relevant circumstancesduring the term of the PAC, the family meets the income eligibility requirementsof 24 CFR part 813 (as modified in andSection; 885.5) and project assistanceis available for the unit or residential space under the terms of the PAC.The family will not be required to establish its eligibility for admissionto the project under the remaining requirements of paragraph (b) of thissection. (ii) A family's eligibility for Project Assistance Payment also may beterminated in accordance with HUD requirements for such reasons as failureto submit requested verification information, including failure to meetthe disclosure and verification requirements for Social Security Numbers(as provided by 24 CFR part 750) or failure to sign and submit consentforms (as provided by 24 CFR part 760). 45. In andSection; 885.955, paragraph (a)(2) would be revised to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.955 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Obligations of the family. </ITAG>(a) * * * (2) Supply such certification, release, information or documentation asthe Borrower or HUD determines to be necessary, including information relatingto the disclosure and verification of Social Security Numbers, as providedby 24 CFR part 750, and the signing and submission of consent forms, asprovided by 24 CFR part 760. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 886_SECTION 8 HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PROGRAM_SPECIAL ALLOCATIONS</ITAG>46. The authority citation for part 886 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sections 3, 5, and 8, United States Housing Act of1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437a, 1437c, and 1437f); section 7(d), Department of Housingand Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>47. In andSection; 886.119, paragraphs (a)(3) and (7) would be revised toread as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 886.119 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsibilities of owner. </ITAG>(a) * * * (3) Performance of all management functions, including the taking of applications;selection of families, verification of income, provision of Federal selectionpreferences in accordance with andSection; 886.132, obtaining and verifyingSocial Security Numbers submitted by applicants (as provided by 24 CFRpart 750), obtaining signed consent forms from applicants (as providedby 24 CFR part 760), and other pertinent requirements; and determinationof eligibility and amount of Tenant Rent in accordance with part 813 ofthis chapter. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(7) Reexamination of family income and composition, redetermination, asappropriate, of the amount of Tenant Rent and the amount of housing assistancepayment in accordance with Part 813; collection of rent; obtaining andverifying participant Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part750; and obtaining signed consent forms from participants, as providedby 24 CFR part 760.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>48. Section 886.124 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 886.124</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Reexamination of family income and composition. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Regular reexaminations.</T3> The owner must reexamine the income andcomposition of all families at least once each year. Upon verificationof the information, the owner must make appropriate adjustments in theTotal Tenant Payment in accordance with part 813 of this chapter and determinewhether the family's unit size is still appropriate. The owner must adjustTenant Rent and the Housing Assistance Payment to reflect any change inTotal Tenant Payment and carry out any unit transfer required by HUD. Atthe time of the annual reexamination of family income and composition,the owner must require the family to disclose and verify Social SecurityNumbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, and to sign and submit consentforms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. (b) <T3> Interim reexaminations.</T3> The Family must comply with provisionsin its lease regarding interim reporting of changes in income. If the Ownerreceives information concerning a change in the Family's income or othercircumstances between regularly scheduled reexaminations, the Owner mustconsult with the Family and make any adjustments determined to be appropriate.At the time of the interim reexamination, the Owner must require the Familyto sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. Any changein the Family's income or other circumstances that results in an adjustmentin the Total Tenant Payment, Tenant Rent and Housing Assistance Paymentmust be verified. See 24 CFR 750.10(d)(2)(i) for the requirements for thedisclosure and verification of Social Security Numbers at interim reexaminationsinvolving new family members. (c) <T3> Continuation of housing assistance payments.</T3> A Family's eligibilityfor housing assistance payments will continue until the Total Tenant Paymentequals the Gross Rent. The termination of eligibility will not affect thefamily's other rights under its lease, nor will such termination precludethe resumption of payments as a result of later changes in income, rents,or other relevant circumstances during the term of the Contract. However,eligibility also may be terminated in accordance with program requirements,for such reasons as failure to submit requested verification information,including failure to meet the disclosure and verification requirementsfor Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, or failureto sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. 49. In andSection; 886.318, paragraphs (a)(3) and (a)(6) would be revisedto read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 886.318</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Responsibilities of the owner. </ITAG>(a) * * * (3) Performance of all management functions, including the taking of applications;selection of families in accordance with the owner's tenant selection factorsapproved by HUD and the Federal preferences in accordance with andSection;886.337; obtaining and verifying Social Security Numbers submitted by applicants,as provided by 24 CFR part 750; obtaining signed consent forms from applicants,as provided by 24 CFR part 760; verification of income and other pertinentrequirements; and determination of eligibility and amount of tenant rentin accordance with part 813 of this chapter; <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(6) Reexamination of family income, composition, and extent of exceptionalmedical or other unusual expenses; redeterminations, as appropriate, ofthe amount of Tenant Rent and amount of housing assistance payment in accordancewith part 813 of the chapter; obtaining and verifying Social Security Numberssubmitted by participants, as provided by 24 CFR part 750; and obtainingsigned consent forms from participants, as provided by 24 CFR part 760.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>50. Section 886.324 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 886.324</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Reexamination of family income and composition. </ITAG>(a) <T3> Regular reexaminations.</T3> The owner must reexamine the income andcomposition of all families at least once each year. Upon verificationof the information, the owner must make appropriate adjustments in theTotal Tenant Payment in accordance with part 813 of this chapter and determinewhether the family's unit size is still appropriate. The owner must adjustTenant Rent and the Housing Assistance Payment to reflect any change inTotal Tenant Payment and carry out any unit transfer required by HUD. Atthe time of the annual reexamination of family income and composition,the owner must require the family to disclose and verify Social SecurityNumbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, and to sign and submit consentforms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. (b) <T3> Interim reexaminations.</T3> The family must comply with provisionsin its lease regarding interim reporting of changes in income. If the ownerreceives information concerning a change in the family's income or othercircumstances between regularly scheduled reexaminations, the owner mustconsult with the family and make any adjustments determined to be appropriate.At the time of the interim reexamination, the owner must require the familyto sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. Any changein the family's income or other circumstances that results in an adjustmentin the Total Tenant Payment, Tenant Rent and Housing Assistance Paymentmust be verified. See 24 CFR 750.10(d)(2)(i) for the requirements for thedisclosure and verification of Social Security Numbers at interim reexaminationsinvolving new family members. (c) <T3> Continuation of housing assistance payments.</T3> A family's eligibilityfor Housing Assistance Payments will continue until the Total Tenant Paymentequals the Gross Rent. The termination of eligibility at such point willnot affect the family's other rights under its lease, nor will such terminationpreclude the resumption of payments as a result of later changes in income,rents, or other relevant circumstances during the term of the contract.However, eligibility also may be terminated in accordance with HUD requirements,for such reasons as failure to submit requested verification information,including failure to meet the disclosure and verification requirementsfor Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, or failureto sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 887_HOUSING VOUCHERS </ITAG>51. The authority citation for part 887 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 3, 5, 8, U.S. Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C.1437a, 1437c, 1437f); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban DevelopmentAct (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>52. In andSection; 887.105, paragraph (b)(1) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.105</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> PHA responsibilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (1) Publish and disseminate information concerning the availability andnature of housing assistance for lower income families (see andSection; 887.107);invite owners to make units available for leasing in the program and developworking relationships with real estate associations and other appropriategroups (see andSection; 887.109); explain program procedures to owners, includingthose who have been approached by housing voucher holders; obtain and verifySocial Security Numbers submitted by families, as provided by 24 CFR part750; obtain signed consent forms from families, as provided by 24 CFR part760; comply with equal opportunity requirements, including efforts to provideopportunities for recipients to seek housing outside areas of economicand racial concentration. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>53. In section 887.355, paragraph (a) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.355 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Regular reexamination of family income and composition. </ITAG>(a) The PHA must reexamine family income and family size and compositionat least annually, and in accordance with Part 813 of this chapter. Atthe time of the annual reexamination of family income and composition,the PHA must require the family to disclose and verify Social SecurityNumbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750, and to sign and submit consentforms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>54. Section 887.357 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.357 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Interim reexamination of family income and composition. </ITAG>A family may request a redetermination of the housing assistance paymentat any time, based on a change in the family's income, adjusted income,size or composition. At the time of interim reexamination, the PHA mustrequire the family to sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24CFR part 760. See 24 CFR 750.10(d)(2)(i) for the requirements for the disclosureand verification of Social Security Numbers at interim reexaminations involvingnew family members. 55. In andSection; 887.401, paragraph (a)(1) would be revised to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.401 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Family responsibilities. </ITAG>(a) * * * (1) Supply any certificate, release, information, or documentation thatthe PHA or HUD determines to be necessary in the administration of theprogram (including the disclosure and verification of Social Security Numbers(as provided by 24 CFR part 750) and the signing and submitting of consentforms (as provided by 24 CFR part 760)), and other information requiredfor use by the PHA in a regularly scheduled reexamination or interim reexaminationof family income and composition in accordance with HUD requirements; <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>56. In andSection; 887.403, new paragraph (d) would be added: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.403 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Grounds for PHA denial or termination of assistance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) <T3>Requirement to sign consent forms. </T3>The PHA must deny eligibilityof applicant's admission to participate in the Housing Voucher program,if the applicant, or any member of the applicant's household, does notsign and submit the consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. Withrespect to a current participant a PHA may terminate housing voucher assistancepayments, refuse to issue another housing voucher for a move to anotherunit, approve a new lease, or execute a new housing voucher contract, ifthe participant, or any member of the participant's household, fails tosign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 900_SECTION 23 HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PROGRAM_NEW CONSTRUCTIONAND SUBSTANTIAL REHABILITATION </ITAG>57. The authority citation for Part 900 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 10(b), United States Housing Act, of 1937 (42U.S.C. 1410(b)); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban DevelopmentAct (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>58. In section 900.103, paragraphs (i) and (j) would be revised to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 900.103 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basic policies. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(i) <T3>Responsibilities of the LHA. </T3>The LHA is responsible for determiningfamily eligibility for assistance in accordance with provisions of 24 CFRparts 912 and 913, and family eligibility and continuing eligibility forassistance in accordance with 24 CFR parts 750 and 760; determining theamount of adjusted income, the amount of rent payable by the family, andhousing assistance payments in accordance with 24 CFR part 913; issuingCertificates of Family Participation to eligible families; notifying familiesdetermined eligible; approving owner-family leases; making housing assistancepayments on behalf of eligible families; reexamining family eligibilityat least annually; inspecting units before leasing, and at least annuallythereafter, to determine that the units are maintained in decent, safeand sanitary condition (failure to do so shall constitute a SubstantialDefault by the LHA under the Annual Contributions Contract); authorizingevictions; and complying with equal opportunity requirements. The LHA mustprovide advice and guidance to eligible families in finding suitable housing,including advice and guidance to families experiencing discrimination,in an affirmative manner to further the policies of Title VI of the CivilRights Act of 1964, Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 and ExecutiveOrder 11063. (j) <T3>Responsibilities of the family. </T3>A family receiving housing assistanceunder this program is responsible for fulfilling all its obligations underboth the lease with the owner and the Certificate of Family Participationissued to it by the LHA: for cooperating with reexamination requirements;for disclosing and verifying Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24CFR part 750; and for signing and submitting consent forms at the timethat the family's eligibility is determined and at the time of any interimor regularly scheduled income reexamination, as provided by 24 CFR part760.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>59. In andSection; 900.202, paragraphs (d)(3) and (f)(2)(iii) would be revisedto read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 900.202</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Project operation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) * * * (3) That the request cannot be approved because the family is not eligible(including ineligibility caused by the family's failure to meet the disclosureand verification requirements for Social Security Numbers, as providedby 24 CFR part 750, or failure to sign and submit consent forms, as providedby 24 CFR part 760), or the dwelling unit or the proposed lease does notmeet program requirements. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(f) * * * (2) * * * (iii) The LHA determines that the family continues to be eligible for suchassistance (including continued eligibility under 24 CFR parts 750 and760). <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 904_LOW RENT HOUSING HOMEOWNERSHIP OPPORTUNITIES </ITAG>60. The authority citation for part 904 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437-1437(r);sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>61. In section 904.104, paragraph (c) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 904.104</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Eligibility and selection of homebuyers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) <T3>Determination of eligibility and preparation of list.</T3> The LHA,without participation of a recommending committee (see paragraph (e)(1)of this section), must determine the eligibility of each applicant familyin respect to the income limits for the development (including the requirementthat the applicant family disclose and verify Social Security Numbers,as provided by 24 CFR part 750, and sign and submit consent forms, as providedby 24 CFR part 760), and must then assign each eligible applicant its appropriateplace on a waiting list for the development, in sequence based upon thedate of the application, suitable type or size of unit, qualification fora Federal preference in accordance with andSection; 904.122, and factorsaffecting preference or priority established by the LHA's regulations.Notwithstanding the fact that the LHA may not be accepting additional applicationsbecause of the length of the waiting list, the LHA may not refuse to placean applicant on the waiting list if the applicant is otherwise eligiblefor participation and claims that he or she qualifies for a Federal preferenceas provided in andSection; 904.122(c)(2), unless the LHA determines, on thebasis of the number of applicants who are already on the waiting list andwho claim a Federal preference, and the anticipated number of admissionsto housing under Turnkey III, that_(1) There is an adequate pool of applicants who are likely to qualify fora Federal preference, and (2) It is unlikely that, on the basis of the LHA's system for applyingthe Federal preferences, the preference or preferences that the applicantclaims, and the preferences claimed by applicants on the waiting list,the applicant would qualify for admission before other applicants on thewaiting list. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>62. In andSection; 904.107, paragraph (m)(1) would be revised to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 904.107</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Responsibilities of homebuyer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(m) <T3>Termination by LHA.</T3> (1) If the homebuyer breaches the HomebuyersOwnership Opportunity Agreement by failure to make the required monthlypayment within 10 days after its due date, by misrepresentation or withholdingof information (including the failure to meet the disclosure and verificationrequirements for Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24 CFR part 750,or the failure to sign and submit consent forms as provided by 24 CFR part760) in applying for admission or in connection with any subsequent reexaminationof income and family composition, or by failure to comply with any of theother homebuyer obligations under the Agreement, the LHA may terminatethe Agreement. No termination under this paragraph may occur less than30 days after the LHA gives the homebuyer notice of its intent to do soin accordance with paragraph (m)(3) of this section. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 905_INDIAN HOUSING </ITAG>63. The authority citation for 24 CFR Part 905 would continue to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 201, 202, 203, 205, United States Housing Actof 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437aa, 1437bb, 1437cc, 1437ee); sec. 7(b), Indian Self-Determinationand Education Assistance Act (25 U.S.C. 450e(b)); sec. 7(d), Departmentof Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>64. In andSection; 905.302, a new paragraph (b)(2)(vi) would be added, toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 905.302 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Admission policies. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (2) * * * (vi) To achieve compliance with 24 CFR part 760, which requires applicantsand participants to sign and submit consent forms at the time eligibilityis determined and at later income reexaminations. 65. In andSection; 905.406, a new paragraph (a)(4) would be added to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 905.406 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selection of MH homebuyers. </ITAG>(a) * * * (4) All admissions under this part are subject to the signing and submissionof consent form requirements, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 913_DEFINITION OF INCOME, INCOME LIMITS, RENT AND REEXAMINATIONOF FAMILY INCOME FOR THE PUBLIC HOUSING AND INDIAN HOUSING PROGRAMS </ITAG>66. The authority citation for part 913 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 3, 6, 16, 201, 202, 203, 205, United States HousingAct of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437a, 1437d, 1437n, 1427aa, 1437bb, 1437cc, 1437ee);sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>67. In andSection; 913.109, paragraph (a) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 913.109 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Initial determination, verification, and reexamination of family incomeand composition. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Responsibility for initial determination and reexamination. </T3>ThePHA is responsible for determination of eligibility for admission; fordetermination of Annual Income, Adjusted Income and Total Tenant Payment,and for reexamination of family income and composition at least annually,as provided in pertinent program regulations and handbooks (24 CFR part960, Subpart B, and 24 CFR parts 750 and 760). As used in this part, the``effective date'' of an examination or reexamination refers to: (1) In the case of an examination for admission, the effective date ofinitial occupancy, and (2) In the case of a reexamination of an existing tenant, the effectivedate of the redetermined Total Tenant Payment. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 960_ADMISSION TO, AND OCCUPANCY OF, PUBLIC HOUSING </ITAG>68. The authority citation for 24 CFR part 960 would continue to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 3, 5, 6, 16, United States Housing Act of 1937(42 U.S.C. 1437a, 1437c, 1437d, 1437n); sec. 7(d), Department of Housingand Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>69. In andSection; 960.204, paragraph (c)(5) would be revised to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 960.204 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">PHA tenant selection policies. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) * * * (5) Be in compliance with State, local and Federal laws and regulations,including the nondiscrimination requirements of Title VI of the Civil RightsAct of 1964, the provisions of the ACC, and 24 CFR parts 750 and 760. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>70. In andSection; 960.206, paragraph (a) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 960.206 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Verification procedures. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Adequate procedures must be developed to obtain and verifyinformation with respect to each applicant. (See part 913 of this chapterand 24 CFR parts 750 and 760.) Information relative to the acceptance orrejection of an applicant or the grant or denial of a Federal preferenceunder section 960.211, must be documented and placed in the applicant'sfile. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>71. Section 960.209 would be revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 960.209 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reexamination of family income and composition. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Regular reexaminations. </T3>The PHA must reexamine the income andcomposition of all tenant families at least once every 12 months and determinewhether the family's unit size is still appropriate. After consultationwith the family and upon verification of the information, the PHA mustmake appropriate adjustments in the Total Tenant Payment and Tenant Rentin accordance with part 913 of this chapter. At the time of the annualreexamination of family income and composition, the PHA must require thefamily to disclose and verify Social Security Numbers, as provided by 24CFR part 750, and to sign and submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFRpart 760. (b) <T3>Interim reexaminations. </T3>The Family must comply with provisionsin its lease regarding interim reporting of changes in income. If the PHAreceives information concerning a change in the family's income or othercircumstances between regularly scheduled reexaminations, the PHA mustconsult with the family and make any adjustments determined to be appropriate.At the time of the interim reexamination, the PHA must require the familyto sign and  submit consent forms, as provided by 24 CFR part 760. Anychange in the family's income or other circumstances that results in adjustmentin the Total Tenant Payment or Tenant Rent must be verified. See 24 CFR750.10(d)(2)(i) for the requirements for the disclosure and verificationof Social Security Numbers at interim reexaminations involving new familymembers. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: August 22, 1989.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Jack Kemp, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-25285 Filed 11-02-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4210-32-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>